 [THE following journal, kept by Isaac Coates , a 
Friend, of Caln, Chester County, describes a jour- 
ney taken to visit "the Indian Country" in Wes- 
tern Pennsylvania, Ohio, and New York, in 1799 and 
1803. It gives an animated description of the coun- 
try passed through, the experiences of the travelers, 
etc., as well as many interesting details concerning 
Friends and the Indians. Isaac was the son of Samuel Coates , of East Caln 
township, and was born Fourth month, 12, 1748. 
He married Hannah Stalker , of the same township, 
(b. 3d mo. 9, 1752), and lived on a farm that had been 
his father's, near the present Caln Station, on the 
Pennsylvania Railroad. It was from here, presuma-
bly, that he set off on the journey described below. 
He was a member of Caln Meeting, and is buried in 
that burying-ground. Among his children was Lind-
 ley Coates, a prominent and esteemed Friend, active 
in the anti-slavery movement. Lydia , a daughter,
 (b. 2nd mo.6, 1778), was a minister among Friends, 
and died in 1839. She married Mark Hughes , and it 
is their son William , of Avondale, Chester county, 
who has handed us the Journal of his grandfather 
for publication. It will run through several issues of 
 our paper. - EDS. INTELLIGENCER AND JOURNAL.] 6th-day. the 23d of the Eighth month, 1799, after a 
solid time in my family I left home on my journey 
into the Indian Country and Upper Canada. Dined at 
Robt. Moore's fourteen miles. Reached Wm. Webb's , 
twelve miles, and lodged that night; at both places 
kindly entertained. 24th. Dined at Wm. Wright's , where we were af-
fectionately received With some difficulty crossed 
the Susquehannah, (the river being low); passed 
through York Town to my brother Caleb Kirk's . 
This day's ride, twenty-five miles. 25th. Stayed meeting at York, and lodged at 
brother Caleb's two nights. 26th. Rode to Warrington, eleven miles; attended 
quarterly meeting, after which rode to Thos. Thorn-
burg's, eight miles; lodged and fared sumptuously. 27th. Rode over and through the gap in several 
mountains, past a furnace known by the name of 
Kittera's. The precipices on both right and left of 
one of them exhibited a magnificent appearance. 
After which we entered a limestone valley of good 
land, though not improved, as I apprehended, in the 
best manner. Fed our horses at the stone tavern, 
sixteen miles; [then] to Shippensburg twelve and 
one-half miles, part of which, notwithstanding it was 
in the valley, appeared to be very poor, covered with 
pine of small growth and barren oaks. A few miles 
before we reached Shippensburg we passed through 
some excellent wheat land, being covered with black 
oak and hickory. Dined at Shippensburg. The gen-
eral part of the corn thus far very poor; buckwheat, 
in some place, pretty good. Then proceeded to a 
small village called Strasburg, ten miles; through 
tolerable land but no water which I thought fit to 
drink for myself or horse for twenty miles. Then 
ascended the mountain called the Blue Ridge, the 
ascent and descent of which is three miles, affording 
a prospect which shows the wonderful works of the 
Author of Nature. Crossed a branch of the Conodo-
guinet running to the right, and lodged at Skinner's 
in Horse Valley. This day's ride, forty-one and a
 half miles. 28th. In the morning, ascended and descended 
two large mountains, the valley between them called 
Path Valley, in which is a small village called Ferris-
burg; it being seven miles across those two moun-
tains. In the aforesaid valley is a fine stream run-
ning to the right, called Conogocheak [Conoco-
cheague]; and a pretty good settlement. After 
crossing the mountains, very poor broken land thinly 
inhabited, to Fort Littleton, twelve miles from 
Skinner's ; here we breakfasted. In crossing those 
mountains and valleys my mind was much em-
ployed in contemplating the wonderful works of an 
all-wise Creator. To John Skinner's on the top of Sidling Hill, 
eleven miles, being a tremendous mountain, on the 
ridge of which we rode about four miles; at the end 
thereof, and descending the mountain, a grand pros-
pect opened of the Allegheny Mountain and what
 appeared a tolerably level valley, considerably im-
proved with plantations; but in riding through it we 
found it to be very hilly, approached to mountains; 
then crossed a branch of Juniata, running to the 
right, and rode to Hartley's , where we expect to lodge. 
The river was frequently on our right hand and fre-
quently near our left hand, and we on an eminence 
perhaps of one or two hundred feet, some place ap-
proaching near perpendicular. This day's ride, thir-
ty-nine miles. 29th. Rode up the valley through some tolerably 
good limestone land to Bedford, six miles; crossed two 
branches of the aforesaid water. After leaving Bed-
ford passed through a gap in Wills' Mountain and 
over Juniata again. Here is some of the best land 
and the best improved I have yet seen amongst those 
mountains. To our right to Stotler on the ridge, in 
divers places was oats growing of a good length; some 
ripe, some almost ripe, and some standing in shock. 
From thence to Berlin, thirteen miles. On our way 
we met an old man who had just killed a large buck 
which had horns with a number of prongs, covered 
with the velvet, which he had skinned and had some 
 of the meat tied up in it carrying about his neck in 
the manner of a knapsack. In riding six miles we 
came to the foot of the great Allegheny mountains 
where is some good land; buckwheat and oats about 
of an equal ripeness, both good, but the buckwheat 
extraordinary; as much so as I think I have ever 
seen. The ascent of this mountain better land than 
any of the others, being covered with lofty timber of 
divers sorts, and on the top of said mountain got some 
excellent water, being the first I have met with since 
I left home. After we got over the mountains the 
timber was very thick but much destroyed with fire. 
Two or three miles before we came to Berlin the land 
appeared to be excellent, covered with heavy timber, 
black oak, white oak, red oak, hickory, and sugar 
maple, grass and other vegetables very flourishing, it 
having been a wet growing season. This day's ride, 
thirty-six miles. 30th. Took an early set-off from Berlin, being a 
village of about 50 houses; passed through some very 
rough lands and roads on which I saw a rattlesnake 
about three feet long with ten rattles, lying in the 
road, appearing to have been just killed by a wagon-
wheel running over it. Part of the way to this stage 
the land was covered with most beautiful lofty chest-
nuts, and part of the way very thick set with white 
pine, being thirteen miles; [reached] a Dutch tavern 
where we thought best to breakfast on our own choco-
late. From thence to George Bachelor's , fourteen 
miles in which we crossed what is called Laurel Hill, 
being one mountain after another for seven or eight 
miles of the way. The ascent of one of them ex-
ceeded all for chestnut timber I ever saw; they stand 
so thick together and are so tall that I fully believe 
there are thousands of acres that would yield more 
than 10,000 rails to the acre. Almost all those moun-
tains that go by the aforesaid name are the most fer-
tile of any I have yet seen; the trees and vegetables 
of every kind are so luxuriant I could not help feel-
ing some attachment to the place; but when I con-
sidered the exceeding rough mountainous face of the 
surface and the intolerable road to and from the 
place, I am content if I should live to return to spend 
the remainder of my days in Chester County. Pro-
ceeded to Connelstown, being a new settled place of 
about fifty houses on the Yoghagena [Youghiogheny] 
river. Lodged with our old friends, Thomas and 
Joshua Gibson , sixteen miles. Nothing very remark-
able the last stage, except in one place about six miles 
back, we rose to or on an eminence where a grand 
prospect opened to view, to the east, the north, and 
the west, particularly to the west where we could see 
as far as the eye could reach-I suppose as far as the 
Ohio river. Here on the Yoghagena river the people 
were employed in building flat-bottomed boats, the 
stern of which they cover with thin boards for a 
shelter. Some of them are thirty, some forty, and 
some fifty feet long and twelve wide, in which they 
will carry 360 barrels of flour or iron or other pro-
duce in proportion, to Kentucky or New Orleans. 31st. Crossed the Yoghogany, being a small river, 
perhaps hal fas large as Schuylkill above the Falls. 
About a mile from said river as we rode up a small 
stream large enough to turn a mill, we came to a curi-
ous limestone rock lying horizontal, about three feet 
thick, forming a concave semi-circle of perhaps 300 
feet, near the centre of which the water fell about 
 twenty-eight feet there being a walk on another rock 
about twelve feet below the other, and near the same 
distance deep back behind the water where we might 
safely walk. Just at one side and near the centre of
the semi-circle a spacious grist mill is built butting up 
against the rock. Then passed over many hills and 
valleys to Reese Cadwallader,s , twenty miles. Passed 
a new paper-mill occupied by Jonathan Sharpless , on 
Redstone creek; also Samuel Jackson's grist mill at 
the mouth of said creek, over which there is a large 
bridge, near thirty feet high, wide enough for a wagon 
to cross. We were expecting to find a road in pro-
portion; but immediately after getting over we found 
ourselves on a narrow path perhaps not more than 
five feet wide, and a precipice on our left hand down to 
 Redstone creek, and on our right hand down to 
the Monongahela river, each of them near perpen-
dicular, which was near 200 feet, which to some of 
our company was truly alarming; and I believe 
would have been more so had it not been that a 
bulky woman rode on just before us seemingly with-
out care or fear. Then rode up the last mentioned 
river through a beautiful town on the bank of the 
same, perhaps of forty or fifty houses. This river I 
think is larger than Schuylkill, running to the right. 
The land thus far through the Redstone settlement is 
very rough and mountainous, and appears to be very 
fertile, producing wheat, rye, oats, buckwheat, and 
grass in abundance even on the top of the hills, and 
abundance of lofty timber of many sorts, particularly 
sugar maple and white oak. But notwithstanding it 
hath been a very wet growing season and all kinds of 
grain in the ground and vegetables look luxuriant, 
yet the waters are very low, which induces me to 
believe that, when the land comes to be more gener-
ally cleared and a dry season takes place (which I 
suppose frequently does), the inhabitants will suffer 
from lack of water. The reason in part as I take it, 
of the water's failing so much is a horizontal rock 
which lies a little underground, I believe, over much 
of the country. Ninth month 1st, being First-day, attended Red-
stone meeting. In the afternoon crossed the Monon-
gahela at Bridgetown, the banks of which, I am in-
formed, will average forty feet. Rode five miles of 
the roughest road I have yet passed to Francis Town-
send's. 2nd. Attended quarterly meeting at Westland, 
which notwithstanding some weaknesses [and] dis-
order appeared in the conduct of the young people, 
was a comfortable, solid time, there being a number 
of well-concerned, valuable Friends engaged in con-
ducting the business of this remote and newly es-
tablished quarterly meeting. Here I met with a 
number of my former acquaintances who had re-
moved to this country years past, divers of them in 
low or straightened circumstances, that now appeared 
to live in fullness and plenty; many of whom I hope 
are in a good measure thankful to their kind Bene-
factor who hath spread them a table in the wilder-
ness and provided a comfortable asylum in this 
 western country. We were truly glad to see each 
other. This night, lodged at my kind friend, Jonas 
Cattel's. 3rd. Passed the time very agreeably amongst our 
friends about Bridgeport, on the Monogahela, in 
preparing necessaries for our wilderness journey, and 
lodged at the same place. 4th. Stayed and attended meeting at Redstone, 
where was a marriages accomplished between Samuel 
Jones, hatter, formerly of York, and Ruth , the 
daughter of Reese Cadwallader . Dined at our kind 
friend Jonas Cattel's . Friends at this place were ex-
ceeding kind, and seemed as if they thought they 
could hardly do enough for us. Got well equipped by 
them for our journey and set off soon after dinner. 
Crossed the beautiful river Monongahela and rode 
eleven miles to one Graybil's , where we lodged. The 
most of the way tolerable; good land though moun-
 tainous and not equal ot Redstone land for fertility. 
About ten miles from the river, on our way we 
crossed a considerable stream called Pidgeon's creek, 
running to the right. 5th. Rode eight miles to one Barclay's , got break-
fast. Nothing very remarkable occurred on our way 
this stage, except as we rode a considerable way up a 
branch of Mango creek, in divers places the water 
fell off a smooth, horizontal rock, some place four, 
some six, and some more feet; and up this narrow 
valley the greatest quantity of sugar maple with 
troughs for collecting sap appeared, of any place 
I have yet seen, though they abound through the 
country in such plenty that I think if the inhabitants 
are careful, and frugal they need never import the 
luxury of sugar. Even if other timber should fail 
for firing, the stone-coal is plenty in these parts; 
[rode] from thence to Pittsburg, fifteen miles. About 
one mile from Barclay's is a sawmill occupied and 
owned by one Baldwin who removed from 
Newlin, a Friendly man; which I though might be 
good quarters if I should ever travel this road again. 
No great variations in the land except gradually de-
clining towards poor land. When we arrived on the 
top of the mountain, where we got the first sight of 
Pittsburg, we soon began to descend the steepest hill 
I ever saw a wagon road upon, which to me appeared 
almost impraticable for a good team to draw an 
empty wagon up. Nevertheless the inhabitants say 
 they frequently go up loaded. When we descended 
to the bottom we again crossed the beautiful Monon-
gahela and immediately entered the town where we
 stayed the afternoon in providing some necessaries, 
in which I took the opportunity to walk down to the 
point or junction of the aforesaid river and the Alle-
gheny, which makes the great and grander River Ohio, 
it being a delightful prospect. Also had a view of 
the remains of the old French Fort Duquesne and the 
English fort, which are both very much demolished 
and beautiful grass-lots in their place. This town 
appears to be a lively place of trade containing per-
haps 200 houses. [To be Continued.] EITHER we must lay self aside, or God will lay us
 aside.--GURNALL. Ninth month 6th. [1799]. Set off early from Pitts-
burg and immediately crossed the Allegheny river, a 
beautiful stream about a quarter of a mile wide. For 
about two or three miles after crossing, we rode 
through the richest piece of land I think I ever be-
held, for so much. The stately walnuts [were] four 
feet through, and a great length, and other timber in 
proportion, every herb and plant appearing as luxu-
riant as if it had grown out of a dung heap. Soon 
after that, a declension of soil took place and pro-
gressed until it became, as I thought, very poor, 
rough, and hilly, until we came to one Duncan's, 
where we fed our horses and dined from the supply 
of our bags, it being eighteen miles; from thence to
 one Bovear's , where three of our company lodged. 
James Cooper and myself rode six miles further to 
my cousin, Abner Coats's , who is just newly settled in 
the woods; has got about ten acres of land cleared 
and seems in a likely way to make a living. He was 
very kind and glad to see me; tied up our horses, 
fed them with bran and cut corn-tops, with which 
they seemed to do very well. All this stage appeared 
to me to be very poor, until we turned off the road 
and got near Abner's , where the land appears tolera-
bly level and pretty good soil. We crossed one large 
and one lesser stream running to the right, called 
Conyconeys. Divers places the road was intolerable 
for short steep hills,--so much so that going down 
some of them, leading our horses, we seemed in dan-
ger of their falling down upon us. This day, rode 
thirty-four miles. 7th. Rode from Abner Coats's to Funk's , seventeen 
miles; it being a very rainy day, which made the 
road so bad, together with the bills, rocks, and sloughs 
or little guts descending out of the mountains, that 
for bad traveling it exceeded all I have yet met with. 
We crossed two large streams, the first called Mud 
Creek; the second, Slippery Rock. From thence to 
McClern's, nine miles. The road tolerably good for 
this country and the land about middling, being much 
covered with white oak. At this place we arrived 
about two in the afternoon; appearing to be good quar-
ters for ourselves and horses, we stayed all night, and 
lodged comfortably in the barn. 8th. Set off early and rode to Franklin [country 
seat of Venango county, Pa.], a small town of perhaps 
ten or fifteen houses, on French creek, a small dis-
tance above the fort at the junction of said creek and 
the Allegheny river, thirteen miles. The most of 
this stage is stony chestnut land. About four miles 
before we got to Franklin, we crossed Sandy Creek, 
the descent and ascent of the mountains on each 
side being each of them about half a mile, and in 
some places, I think near forty-five degrees of eleva-
tion. Going down the hill I discovered my mare had 
lost one of her shoes, and by the time I got to this 
place she began to limp pretty much, and no smith 
here. The prospect looks dull to proceed from here 
to Jonathan Titus's , on Oil Creek, eighteen miles. Im-
 mediately after leaving Franklin we crossed French 
Creek, and soon entered very poor, barren land 
which continued for several miles; then came to land 
more level than any we have seen the west side of 
Allegheny river, for so much; some bottoms, very 
rich abounding with plums, some of it rather too 
much upon a dead level to be very good for wheat, 
and exceeding thick set with small timber, partic-
larly quaking asp. About twelve miles from Frank-
lin we came across a cabin and a few acres of 
ground cleared, where the people looked clean and 
decent; had abundance of watermelons with which 
they regaled us plentifully without charge. A few 
more cabins and small lots cleared we saw on our way 
between French Creek and Oil Creek. Rattlesnakes 
abound here. I saw a large one of about three feet 
nine inches long, and about as thick as my wrist. I 
alighted and killed it; cut off the rattles, being nine. 
Great numbers of wild tur-
keys are here; we saw several flocks containing forty 
or more and might easily have shot some of them if 
we had had guns and ammunition. We arrived at Titus's a little before sunset; got our 
horses to good pasture, and lodged comfortably in his 
barn. Said Titus being a young man, settled here on 
Oil Creek in the woods about two and a half years 
ago, has made a great improvement for the time; 
owns 400 acres of land, the most of it a rich bottom; 
has got about twenty-six acres of excellent corn in 
the ground, a considerable quantity of wheat in stack; 
a spring of excellent water near the door, large enough 
to turn a breast-mill; so that upon the whole I think 
this farm likely in time to be of most inestimable 
value, Oil Creek being boatable this high, which is 
about eighteen miles from the mouth where it empties 
into Allegheny. Oil Creek took its name from the oil 
 which is skimmed off the water in great quantities, 
resembling the Seneca or British oil in smell; its 
length being about thirty-six miles from its mouth to 
the place where it issues out of a small lake. 9th. Being very rainy, I rode two miles to a black-
smith at Oil Creek mill, got a shoe on my mare and 
returned to my company at Titus's , where we remained 
all this day, it being very wet, and lodged in the same 
barn. 10th. Being a fine morning, we set off early and 
rode twenty-nine miles near the mouth of a large 
stream called Brokenstraw, where we pitched our 
tent, kindled a fire, and lodged in the woods. I am 
not furnished with language or memory to describe 
the particulars of this day's journey, but may en-
deavor to note some particulars. After leaving Titus's 
we rode two miles to a newly erected mill and saw-
mill on a branch of Oil Creek, which the Holland 
Company have erected in order to supply the new 
settlers with flour, etc., and divers of them come there 
twenty, twenty-five, and more miles with bags of 
grain on a horse, to be ground; there being no road 
that any carriage can pass, and indeed, (to such who 
have not seen those mountainous new countries), it 
would appear to impraticable to pass with a single 
horse. After leaving the mill we soon entered a
forest of white pine, hemlock and divers other sorts 
of timber not necessary to mention, and great part of 
our ride this day was through timber of that sort; 
some of the way tolerably level, but a great part of it 
such mountains thickly set with stones and rocks, 
which together with the interlocking of the roots 
of the timber, a little comparable to a corn-rid-
dle, and the deep swampy guts, it was with difficulty 
we got along over roots and rock the cavities be-
tween them being so deep and so close together that
had our horses got their legs in, (and this to appear-
ance seemed almost unavoidable), they must have 
been broken. But I suppose the way to be much bet-
ter than it was two years ago, being now a cut path 
all the way, which was not the case then. In many 
places the timber is, I believe, from one hundred to 
two hundred feet high, and thickly set, insomuch that 
a great part of the face of the ground and rocks 
is scarcely ever saluted with the luminous rays of the 
sun, which I think is the reason of the rocks and old 
logs being very thick set with coats of moss; and as 
 the seed of different kinds of trees falls on this moss 
which the rocks and old logs contain, there being 
moisture enough contained in it to occasion a vegeta-
tion, the body or trunk ascends and the roots crawl
 on the surface of the rock or log to the edge, and then 
descend into the gorund, and great numbers of that 
description are grown into large trees the roots of 
which clasp a rock a little similar to the clasp of an 
eagles claw; and on many of these rocks there are 
several trees. I saw one rock about twenty feet in 
diameter, which had seven trees on it, some of 
which were two or three feet over and perhaps 
one hundred and fifty feet high and the rock 
ten or twelve feet high. I think we saw neither 
house nor improvement for twenty miles; neither 
can I suppose much of it will be settled for many 
years to come, We came on the Brokenstraw about
 seven miles above the mouth and rode sixe miles down 
the stream to the place of our encampment, through 
a very rich bottom. As I rode along this day 
I frequently experienced a transition of ideas; 
while passing through the dark shades of the thick 
and lofty timber which sometimes appeared like a 
desolate, gloomy wilderness comparable to the gloom 
of eternal night; and other times so great, so grand, 
so magnificent that it became truly transporting. 11th. Set off early, without taking breakfast or 
feeding our horses. Rode down the aforesaid creek 
almost to the mouth and with some difficulty got 
along, the Indian path up the river being in many 
places hard to be discovered, to a place called War-
ren [now the county seat of Warren county], being a 
newly laid out town, but without much building ex-
cept one cabin and a storehouse built by the Hol
land Company near the mouth of another large 
stream called Connowongo. Here we breakfasted 
and fed our horses. The people in the cabin were 
very kind, made our chocolate for us and gave us 
some good pigeon soup. [Distance] nine miles. Here 
we hired a guide; rode over the Connowongo, and 
followed our guide with undescribable difficulty 
about sixteen miles to Cornplanter's settlement. The 
logs, the brush, and thick-set young timber rendered 
this stage extremely difficult and tiresome; almost a 
continual succession of logs, in many places three or 
four in a perch, as high as our horses could step over, 
and many of them they had to jump; and the young 
growth being so thick that if we were two rods apart 
we would have to call out to each other in fear of be-
ing lost. About an hour before sunset we reached the 
new house which Cornplanter is getting built, and 
the schoolhouse where Henry Simmons teaches the 
young Indians, at which place we met with Henry, 
greatly to our mutual comfort, and where we tarried 
all night in the schoolhouse. At this place there are 
several comfortable houses building, it being about 
one mile lower down the river than where Cornplan-
ter's village stands, and appears to be on more suita-
ble ground, which with the advice of our young men, 
the Indian inhabitants of the town just above, pro-
posed to move. Cornplanter and many others of the 
nation came this evening to visit us, and appeared to 
be much pleased with our coming. 12th. This morning the old chief and some of his 
connections brought us some cucumbers to help out 
our breakfast, and immediately returned to his vil-
lage. We then soon set off up the river, Henry Sim-
mons bearing us company, and in about one mile we 
came to the town. Stopped a few minutes with the 
Indians who gathered around us apparently much 
pleased with our arrival. We proposed a council or 
conference with them, to be held in two days after 
that time, to which they readily assented, and agreed 
to send out some runners to inform their people. 
We then took leave of them for the present and pro-
ceeded up and across the river twice to Genesinguhta, 
to our dear friends, Halliday Jackson and Joel 
Swayne, whom we met with mutual joy, and rested 
pretty much in the house the remainder of this day,
 the path from Cornplanter's to Genesinguhta being 
in some places very difficult passing; [the distance] 
being nine or ten miles. 13th. Stayed with our friends and visited several 
families of Indians in their houses and cabins. One 
Indian, John , has built himself a snug house and 
kitchen, the logs well-hewn and the joists and boards 
planed, [with] sash and glass windows. He has 
mowed and made two good stacks of hay, fenced in 
several acres of ground in which he has good corn; 
and several others of them are improving in their 
buildings, fencing, etc. We have fared very well 
this day on provision wellcooked by Halliday Jack-
son; also walked about and reviewed the improve-
ment made by our young friends in this wilderness 
country, which appears considerable. And although
I think the spot they are settled upon is much infer-
ior to many other places in these parts for fertility, 
yet their corn and buckwheat are good; [they] had 
pretty good oats, have a considerable quantity of hay 
procured, a large garden of good vegetables, and have 
about five acres of ground cleared and plowed ready 
to sow wheat. They have got a comfortable two-
story house to live in, and several other necessary
buildings. [To be Continued.] Ninth month 14th, [1799]. After breakfast, pre-
pared to set off nine miles down the river to Corn-
planter's village,[NOTE.--Genesinguhta, where the travelers met Halliday 
Jackson and Joel Swayne , as described last week, was on the 
Allegheny Reservation of the Seneca Indians, on the Allegheny 
river, just above the line, in New York State. Cornplanter had a 
village and private reservation of his own,--about 1300 acres,-- 
down the river, and below the line, in Warren county, Pennsyl-
vania. He called it Genesedaga. The town of Kinzua is now on 
the opposite side of the river.] in order to attend the council be-
fore appointed, and nine of us embarked in a canoe 
to wit: Indian John , Halftown , Halliday Jackson , 
Joel Swayne , Joshua Sharples , Thomas Stewardson , 
James Cooper , myself, and Hugh Hartshorn . Had a 
pleasant sail down the river, and arrived at our des-
tined port a little before 11 o'clock, divers of the dis-
tant chiefs being collected before we came. Before 
we sat in council, walked about, viewing some of the 
Indian cottages and their dress, which would take 
more time to describe than I am at this time dis-
posed to take. About an hour after we arrived, a 
large horn, something like a French horn, was 
blown, in order to collect the chiefs and others to 
council; and in a short time they collected in a part 
of Cornplanter's house or cabin, perhaps to the num-
ber of thirty or more. We all sat down in stillness a 
short space, when the old chief stood up (his son 
Henry O'Beil interpreting), and addressed us in sub-
stance as follows: Ninth month 14th, [1799]. Brothers, I am glad the good Spirit has favored 
you all with health in your long journey to come and 
see us and take us by the hand, so that we may 
brighten the chain of friendship; and now some of 
us are collected, we should be glad to hear what you 
have to say to us. We then informed them that we had taken a long 
journey to see our young men who were settled 
among our Indian brothers, and that we had not 
much that we knew of to say to the Indians; only to 
know from themselves how they liked our young 
men being amongst them, and whether they thought 
they were likely to be useful to them or not. We 
then had our certificate read and interpreted to them, 
with which they expressed satisfaction; and we hav-
ing agreed upon a short piece of advice or queries to 
lay before them, which we had in writing, it was read 
by paragraphs and interpreted to them as follows: Ninth month 14th, [1799]. "Brothers, you have now heard that our coming 
here was to see how you and our young men who 
live amongst you are getting along. We are glad the 
Good Spirit has favored us to meet you in health, and 
given us this opportunity of taking you by the hand 
and brightening the chain of friendship. Now broth-
ers, we should like to hear from your own mouths if 
you are quite satisfied with our young men living 
amongst you. They came here with a hope of being 
useful, by instructing you in a better way of manag-
ing your land and providing for yourselves and your 
cattle. We desire you to speak freely brothers. It 
has been some satisfaction to us in riding through 
your town to see marks of industry taking place; that 
you are building better and warmer houses to live in; 
and that so much of your cleared land is planted with 
corn, potatoes, beans, squashes, cucumbers, etc., and 
to see these articles kept in good order. Brothers, we 
observe where your new houses are building, that the 
timber is very much cut off a rich flat which we wish 
you encouraged to clear and make it fit for plowing. 
We believe it to be very good land for wheat, as well 
as corn, and as the white people are settling around 
you, the deer and other wild game will grow scarce 
and more difficult to be taken. We therefore hope 
that more of your men will assist in clearing land, 
fencing it, planting it with corn, and sowing it with 
wheat. You will then have a supply of provision 
more certain to depend upon than hunting. Broth-
ers, we were pleased to see your stock of cattle in-
creased; the rich bottoms on the river will be plenty 
for them to live on in the summer season, but as your 
winters are long and cold, it will require something 
for them to live on in the winter. Now the white 
people keep their cattle on hay, on straw and on 
corn-fodder. Straw you cannot get until you raise 
wheat or other grain; the rich bottoms, if they were 
put in order, would produce a great deal of hay; but 
for an immediate supply, we think, if as soon as you 
gather your corn you would cut the stalks close at 
the ground, bind them up in small bundles, and put 
them in stack, as our young men do, they would keep 
the cattle part of the cold weather. Brothers, we 
are glad to see a quantity of new fence made this 
summer, near where our young men live, and we 
would not have you get discouraged at the labor it 
takes; for if you will clear a little more land every 
year and fence it, you will soon get enough to raise 
what bread you want, as well as some for grass to 
make hay for winter. Brothers, we understand you 
are desirous to discourage whiskey from being 
brought amongst you, with which we are much 
pleased, and should be glad you could entirely keep 
it away; for to get it, you give your money which 
you should have to buy clothes with, and to buy 
oxen and plows with to work your land; and it does 
not do you any good." After which a solemn silence took place, in which 
I thought I felt love to flow to the poor natives, 
accompanied by a strong desire that they might be 
prevailed upon to wholly decline the drinking of 
distilled spirits; for truly I think until some reforma-
tion in that respect takes place amongst them, the 
solid ground on which we can expect their profit-
able civilization is small; and though I felt as I did, 
it seemed discouraging to offer anything to them on 
the occasion, considering my own inability and the 
imperfect interpreter we had--being one who hath a 
strong inclination to the evil habit himself. So I had 
liked to have omitted saying anything, until my friend 
Joshua Sharples , whispered to me and told me if I 
had anything to say to them not to omit it. I then 
addressed them in substance as follows: Ninth month 14th, [1799]. Brothers, your brothers, the Quakers, who have 
come a long way to see you, believe that the Great 
Spirit made both white men and red men, and placed 
them on this great island, gave them many good 
things to live upon such as grain, flesh, fruit, etc., and 
 also gave them understanding hearts. And we also 
believe that his design or intention was that we 
should love and serve him, and not only love him 
and our own people but love and be at peace with all 
people of all nations and colors. But some white 
men became very cunning and sought out new inven-
tions, one of which was making rum, whiskey, 
brandy, etc., out of the good things that he had given 
them, which at first was used in very small quantities 
as medicine; but as it became more plenty, many 
white men got to love it and drink more of it inso-
much that they became drunk and neglected their 
business; many of their wives and children suffered 
in want of food and clothing, and it seemed to be the 
beginner or forerunner of almost every bad practice. Now brothers, some of your friends, the Quakers, 
many years since were favored to see the mischief 
that rum and whiskey had done, and believed it right 
for them not to drink any more, and have found by 
more than twenty years' experience that they can do 
better without it than with it. And seeing the mis-
chief it did to others, and how much better they 
themselves did without it, believed it right to per-
suade others to do so too; and as we love our Indian 
brothers, and seeing their land is much sold and 
white people settling all round them whereby the 
deer and other game is likely to become so scarce 
that they cannot live by hunting much longer, we 
were drawn in compassion to invite some of our young 
men to come and live amongst you, in order to in-
struct you in the useful ways of the white people who 
have now been some time with you. But we under-
stand that some bad white men let Indians have 
whiskey and that many of them love it so much that 
they often get drunk and are wicked. Brothers, we 
wish you would not hearken to those bad men who 
want you to buy their whiskey, nor give way to your 
own love for it, but stand against it and not use any 
of it; for if you do, your friends, the Quakers, will 
be discouraged and hang down their heads and go 
and leave you. But if you will stand against it and 
not use it, become sober men, they will be willing to 
assist and instruct you what they can. I believe the interpreter endeavored to render it 
into the Indian language as well as he could, though 
he appeared somewhat convicted; and I also think 
they understood it pretty well, as there appeared a 
general concurrence by their usual nod and sound on 
such occasions, and by what the old chief said to us 
after, on our asking them if they had anything to say 
to us, he replied that Henry Simmons had told him 
some time ago that he intended to go home this fall, 
(Henry having taught school at Cornplanter's village), 
and that he could not give us an answer until he knew 
whether Henry would go or not. We then agreed to 
be a little time by ourselves. They left us a few min-
utes and we laid the matter close to Henry . He then 
told us that he believed it was his duty to come here 
and he now believed it was his place to go home, 
which we could not gainsay, though we felt sorry the 
Indian children should be left without an instructor. 
The chiefs were called in again, and tenderly informed 
of Henry's intention of returning. Cornplanter then 
replied if it was right, he could not say against it, but 
was afraid he should not have help enough to keep 
away the whiskey, as Henry had been a great help to 
him in that, and that he thought the Indians would 
now mind him more than they would one of them; 
and then said that when our young men came first 
amongst them some of their warriors did not like it, 
but now he believed they all liked it, and all 
spoke very well of them, and wished the young 
men to tell us if any of the young Indians or others 
behaved bad to them. They then all rose up and in 
a friendly manner shook hands with us and did what 
they call "cover the council fire." Then one of their 
women brought in a large loaf of unleavened wheat 
bread and a tin cup full of pretty good butter, on 
which we dined and took our departure up the river. 
Halliday Jackson, James Cooper, and myself walked, 
the others all went back in the canoes we came down in. 
Arrived at the young men's home just before sunset, 
and lodged this night with them. [NOTE.--Cornplanter , at the time of this visit, was about 60 to 
65 years old. He was of half-blood only, the son of a white man 
named John O'Bail , a Mohawk Valley trader. He is believed to 
have been with the French in the defeat of Braddock , in 1755, 
and he afterwards took part with the British, in the War of the 
Revolution. After that, however, he devoted himself to peace, and 
refused to fight. In the Indian disturbances from 1791 to 1794, he 
kept the Senecas friendly, and he continued to live on his reserva-
tion to his death, in 1836, when he was considered to be about 100 
years old. The accounts of him say that "he deplored the evils 
of intemperance, and exerted himself to suppress it.] 15th, and first of the week. Have not gone much 
out of the house to-day. Sat down with the young
men at their usual time of holding their meeting, 
which to me and I believe to others was a solid, 
strengthening time. A little after night, Joshua 
Sharples went out of the house and just as he came 
in, the trap-door of the cellar being open, he stepped
 in it and fell with the back of his head against one of 
the joists or sleepers, and so down into the cellar. 
We all made what haste we could down, finding him 
stunned and senseless. We were exceedingly 
alarmed, got some camphor, bathed his temples and 
other places so that in about two or three minutes 
he came to so as to speak, but knew not that any-
 thing was the matter, or where he was, for a con-
siderable time. At length his understanding re-
turned, but he could not all the evening recollect 
falling, being a good deal hurt. Our getting away 
from her as soon as we proposed, [now] looks doubt-
 ful; but it is a great comfort to us to find him as well 
as he appears to be. Went to bed and I slept with 
him in some hopes he may be better in the morning. 16th. Joshua quite as well as we could expect, 
but not fit to travel. This day we have had a visit 
from five or six Indian chiefs who stayed with us 
the most of the day and appeared very much pleased 
in being in our company and viewing a map which 
we had with us. Soon got to understand it so that 
they could point out almost any of the rivers and 
lakes. About noon Cornplanter came and brought us 
a quarter of venison and two pigeons. Offered to 
send some of his people to pilot us to Buffalo, but we 
could not tell him when we could go, not knowing 
when our friend would be able to travel. About the 
middle of the afternoon they all took an affectionate 
farewell of us for the present. 17th. A fine day. Joshua appearing some better, 
eighteen or twenty of the Indians came to see us and 
bade us farewell. About one o'clock we set off, Hal-
liday Jackson bearing us company. We took an 
affectionate farewell of our other two friends, after 
an uniting opportunity just before parting. Rode 
about four miles up the river through middling good 
land to the house of one of the old chiefs who was 
with us yesterday, and who had his horse standing 
hitched ready to pilot us up the river to a small set-
tlement of Indians. On riding along we discovered 
they had the day before opened and cut the path 
wider and better for several miles just on our ac-
count; and on our way we passed a new settlement, 
made this summer by Halftown , on some most excel-
lent land. Where he lives he has cleared and fenced 
two or three acres and got it in with corn and vines. 
After crossing the river we rode to another chief's 
house where there are several cabins, and pitched our 
tent and lodged on the river bank. They were kind 
to us in their way, and gave us two very good squir-
 rels. This being ten miles up the river. 18th. Being a rainy morning, we set off having 
Sunfish and Halliday Jackson for our guides, which 
we found to be very useful to use before night, it be-
ing a very wet day and much of the way so swampy 
and difficult that we should have been much beset 
without them. Abundance of the way through, the 
wilderness is so stopped up with wind falls of timber, 
many of which are so large in low ground and fallen 
one on another for a mile together, that to a stranger 
it would seem altogether impassable. Many of these 
with great difficulty we have to jump our horses over, 
and perhaps in mud half leg deep; and many of 
them were so large no horse could leap them. We 
went up the river three miles and then took up a 
valley about twelve miles, down which a creek of 
about the size of our branch of Brandywine runs. 
Excellent good land all the way up, there being 
abundance of sugar maple, beech, ash, birch, and 
bass. I have seen sugar maple in abundance that 
were three feet over and near one hundred feet high; 
the other timber in proportion. We then ascended 
a very high mountain; good land up it, and on the 
top still good, being covered with very heavy, lofty 
timber some of which is white pine, some poplar, 
and the other as before mentioned. Before we as-
cended the mountain we came to the heads of springs
within a few perches of each other, some of which
run into the Allegheny and some into the Cattarau-
gus. The former empties into the Ohio; the latter 
into Lake Erie and so down the river St. Lawrence. 
In some places, abundance of wild cherry three and 
four feet in diameter, perhaps sixty and some eighty 
feet to the first limb. But as I do not intend to give 
a minute description of the land, water, and timber, 
only to give a sketch of what appeared remarkable, 
suffice it to say that in this day's ride, (which was a 
very wet one through abundance of swampy land), I 
think the land was generally good and heavy loaded 
with timber. This day's ride, twenty-four miles. 
Pitched our tent by a spring amongst lofty timber, 
and just after we got our fire made and tent raised, it 
began to rain very fast, and was an exceeding wet 
night, accompanied with a great wind or storm inso-
much that we heard the tree falling almost all 
around us. Our situation appeared to be somewhat 
trying; but as we had no alternative, soon composed 
oursevles and went to sleep. [To be Continued.] Ninth month 19th, [1799]. It being likely for a fair 
day, we set off, though the bushes were very wet, and
rode to Lake Erie, 27 miles, and pitched our tent on 
the margin thereof. We passed some very bad, 
swampy road in the morning. The timber and land 
much as yesterday and almost all the way, so far as 
I have come through the New York State, there ap-
 pear to be very few stones. But after riding 8 or 10 
miles this day, we came to abundance of the most 
beautiful poplar trees I have ever seen; and about 
one mile before we crossed Cattaraugus River we 
came into a bottom of very rich land, wherein abun-
dance of black walnut stand, many of them three, 
four, five, and perhaps some six feet in diameter, and 
sixty or severty feet to the first limb. Crossed Cat-
taraugus, being ten miles from our lodging, and rode 
ten more to an Indian village. Stopped awhile with 
them, but as their chief was not at home we soon 
left them, and rode seven miles through a low piece 
of land heavily timbered with hemlock, sugar ma-
ple, etc., to the lake aforesaid, which, to be sure, at 
first view exhibited a grand prospect here in the 
wilderness, appearing both as to motion and sound 
like the ocean. Had a good supper of chocolate, 
cooked by Halliday , who is yet with us; got a com-
fortable night's sleep, and early in the morning, for 
the first time, heard a wolf howl. 20th. Rode 28 miles down the lake on the beach 
or margin thereof to the mouth of Buffalo Creek. 
Crossed it in a boat and swam our horses over, it be-
ing a very deep channel, about 30 or 40 yards wide. 
Lodged at Joseph Elliot 's headquarters, he being the 
principal surveyor or superintendent of the Holland 
Company's business. Were kindly entertained free 
of cost. This day's ride down the lake was a de-
lightful journey, affording such a variety of prospect 
of the wonderful works of nature. Some places the 
land at the margin of the lake appeared to be pretty 
level; in most others there was a wall on our right 
hand, in many places 50, some 60, and some near, if 
not quite, 100 feet high and almost perpendicular; 
the beach or margin from the water to the wall, 
very diverse for width, some of 20 yards, some 10, 
some 5, and in several places the wall butted into the 
water, where we several times had to ride in round 
the points of rocks knee-deep and sometimes belly-
deep; and in one or two places between a large pyra-
mid of rock and the wall on the right, the pyramind 
appearing conical or in the form of a sugar loaf about 
ten feet in diameter at its base, and about twelve 
feet high. These cones, I believe, are made by the 
dashing of waves, together with the freezing of 
the water in the winter, in the smooth joints of the 
rocks, whereby abundance of them fall down, parting 
 off from their fellows in smooth, perpendicular 
points. The high, perpendicular wall exhibits a curi-
ous view; the stone appears to be principally com-
posed of slate and limestone in different regular 
strata of layers. The bottom or lowermost rocks that 
 I discovered in most places are limestone, curiously 
laid in a horizontal form and nicely jointed in 
squares of eight, ten, or twelve feet in diameter, the
 joints or vaccuums between them mostly about an 
inch wide. Some places we found them to extend into 
the lake; other places not quite to the edge of it; and 
in others not within ten yards of it. Where they ex-
tended to the lake, they formed a beautiful level to 
ride upon. The next layer or stratum is slate about 
ten feet perpendicular. In some places it appeared 
very shelly or near rotten; in many others, excel-
lent slate in great quantities either for flagging or 
covering for houses. Then one general layer of lime-
stone about fifteen or eighteen inches thick; then 
pretty generally slate or other stone to the top of the 
wall or abutment, all which are curiously jointed in 
smooth squares or columnes some two feet square, 
some five, and some in oblong squares two or three 
feet by eight or ten. And as the water in wet times 
penetrates down those joints, I suppose it freezes in 
the winter and bursts off the columns, which fall 
down on the margin of the lake, in many places large 
bodies of them together as much as several square 
rods, and the timber on the top with them. In many 
places the trees were hanging by one half of the
roots with their tops below a level, and some right 
top downwards and not touching the bottom. In 
many places by the continual dahsing of the waves 
 against the rocks they are worn in curious forms. 21st. Rode three miles down on the margin of the 
lake and river Niagara to the ferry. No such curious 
wall on our right hand as yesterday, but similar beds 
of limestone. This Niagara River is the great outlet 
of all the northwestern lakes and waters, which 
makes a very great river above a mile wide and of 
great depth, running very rapidly. We crossed the 
river in a boat, which the heavy current drives across 
in a few minutes, which to some of our company ap-
peared a little terrifying; and then rode up on the 
 margin of the lake on the other side about eight 
miles, which appears to be pretty level except some 
very high banks of sand and a general bed of lime-
stone lying in a form similar to the lower bed 
on the other side. Then turned off from the lake 
about a mile to Daniel Pound 's, where four of us 
dined and left some linen to be washed (Halliday 
Jackson and Hugh Hartshorn having part with us 
 at the ferry and gone down to view the great Falls). 
We then rode to Asa Schooly 's, where we met with
our beloved friends Wiiliam Blakey , Nathan Smith 
and Jacob Paxson , who we heard had arrived two 
days before us. Here we all propose to stay this 
night, our kind friend and landlord appearing to have 
things comfortably convenient about him. They said 
they could contrive for bedding for us all; but 
Thomas Stewardson and myself were desirous to sleep 
on the floor with our blankets, believing it would be 
best on several accounts; but we could not do it with-
out hurting our friend's feelings, so consented to take 
a bed. But when we got to the bed chamber by our-
selves, we found a good clean bed and clothing, which 
we examined, and found a thin straw bed on the 
sacking. We then took off the feather bed and laid 
it in the corner of the room, expecting we should not 
be discovered. But our kind friend came into the 
room and found the bed in the corner, but did not any 
more insist upon our compliance with their request. 22d. and first of the week. Stayed and attended 
their meeting, which is held in the house of our 
friend, Asa Schooly , where we lodged, which to me 
was a dull time, though some lively communications 
therein. After dinner I took an affection farewell 
of Halliday Jackson , who was returned from viewing 
the great Falls and is now about to return through a 
lonesome wilderness to Genesinguhta, the place of 
his present abode. We then classed ourselves in 
order to visit the families in this neighborhood, 
Nathan Smith , Jacob Paxson , and James Cooper 
going in one company, and William Blakey , Joshua 
Sharples, Thomas Stewardson , and myself in another. 
We then proceeded to and visited the families of 
John Cutler , a member; John Harret , and Azariah 
Schooly. Neither of the last two in membership, but 
hopeful, well inclined people. Returned to lodge at 
the same place. I may here note that Joshua Sharp-
les, in getting into the boat at Buffalo Creek, slipped 
and fell on the edge of hte boat, which at first did 
not seem very bad, but [he] hath been gradually 
getting worse. We now think some of his short ribs 
are broken, and it looks as if he would hardly be fit to 
travel to-morrow. 23d. Joshua Sharples being too much amiss to 
venture out, we set out without him and had religious 
opportunities in the families of Daniel Pound , the 
widow Morris , and Obadiah Dennis , the second of 
which in a particular manner was a favorable one; 
and then returned to our old lodging where we all 
met and had a religious opportunity in the family. 24th. Joshua Sharples being unable to travel, we 
left him and rode thirty miles to John Wills 's, where 
we lodged. On our way we rode fourteen miles down 
the river Niagara, crossed Chippeway River and passed 
the great Falls. Several of our company were dis-
posed to take a view of the great phenomenon, but 
James Cooper and myself thought there was not time 
sufficient to satisfy our curiosity, so rode on and left 
 them to take a slight view. We all met at the afore-
said Wills 's, and had an opportunity of retirement in 
the family, in which was some pretty close work. 25th. Set off from John Wills 's, he accompanying 
us, and rode eleven miles to Friends' meeting, at the 
place called the Short Hills, which in the forepart 
 was very heavy and trying, but more lively before the 
conclusion. After meeting, William Blakey , Thomas 
Stewardson, and myself visited Samuel Taylor and 
 family, and went to Jeremiah Moore 's to lodge, in 
whose family we had a solid opportunity. 26th. We visited the families of Enoch Shrigley , 
Solomon Moore , Jacob 
Moore, and Thomas Rice , none
of them members, but all the descendants [of Friends] 
and appear to be thoughtful people. In the evening 
had a religious opportunity in the family of John 
Taylor, whose wife and children are members, but 
John was disowned by the Falls Monthly Meeting 
and is now desirous of being reinstated, and sent an
acknowledgment by William Blakey ; here we lodged. 27th. Joshua Sharples met us yesterday in the 
afternoon, being somewhat better, but weakly yet. 
We visited the families of Joshua Gillam and Ben-
jamin Will, both members, and the family of Thomas 
Gillam, not a member, it being a tender visitation to
 him. We then returned to Jeremiah Moore 's, where 
we met with the rest of our company; had a solid 
conference among ourselves respecting the nature 
of our appointment, which hath felt increasintly 
weighty. Four of us lodged here, to wit: Nathan 
Smith, Thomas Stewardson , Joshua Sharples , and my-
self. 28th. Joshua Sharples went along with James 
Cooper to see a friend. Nathan , Thomas , and myself 
visited two families who are a little inclined to the 
Methodists, and returned to Moore 's to dinner. In 
the afternoon pad some social visits, and lodged at 
the same place, which at present is a temporary home. 29th, and the first of the week. Attended Friends' 
meeting at their usual time and place. After meeting, 
walked four or five miles along with Nathan Smith 
to Samuel Becket 's, where Nathan had appointed a 
meeting to being at four o'clock, to which the neigh-
bors and many of the Firends from about their meet-
ing house came, and which I hope was a time of prof-
itable instruction to some of them. On taking a view 
of the earnest desire which many of them have to
attend such places, the compassionate feelings of my 
heart were very much awakened, especially for their 
 women, many of them going four or five miles on 
foot, some of them with young children in their arms 
and others in such a state that I should have thought 
scarcely fit to travel far on horseback; yet they would 
 and did walk faster than was easy for me, and re-
turned to their homes in a dark night, the men car-
rying lighted torches in their hands to show them 
 the way along their muddy and rooty roads. Lodged 
at the same place. 30th. Spent part of the day agreeably with some 
of our friends; also had a solid opportunity with a 
man who we believed had taken imagination for rev-
elation, which had led him into some strange acts 
and predictions. I hope his state was so clearly 
opened and laid home to him that it may be of use 
to him. He acknowledged he had been deceived and 
followed a lying spirit. In the evening five of us re-
turned to my lodging. [To be Continued.] 1st of the Tenth month [1799.] We all attended a confer-
ence before appointed to be held at Friends' meeting-
house in Pelham township, otherwise the Short Hills, 
with the members of said meeting and the Friends of 
Black Creek, which was conducted with great solem-
nity. In this conference I was more fully convinced 
that there is a small number of seeking, religiously 
minded Friends in both places, and that if they 
abode in the patience and perseverance, the way 
would open ere long for the establishment of a 
monthly meeting amongst them. But the rest of my 
brethren believed the time was already come; so, 
 after expressing my doubts of their being fully ripe 
to be entrusted with the executive part of our Disci-
pline at this time, I freely submitted my feelings to 
the judgment of those whom I esteem to be deeper 
in the religious experience. It was then agree to 
open a new monthly meeting to-morrow at eleven 
o'clock, to be known by the name of Pelham Monthly 
Meeting in Upper Canada, to be composed of Friends 
of Pelham and Black Creek and to be held alternately 
at each place the first Fourth day in every month. 2d. Attended the opening of the new monthly 
meeting, it being a favored opportunity, which re-
vived a hope that if this small number of Friends 
composing said meeting keep in humility and 
steady attention to the best direction, their number and 
experience may so increase that the testimony of 
truth may be supported amongst them. After meet-
ing took leave of our kind friends near the meeting-
house and rode five miles to our friend, Samuel 
Becket's, who is a member of said meeting and who 
kindly entertained six of us, Joshua Sharples staying 
at James Crawford 's. 3d. Thomas Stewardson , James Cooper , Jacob 
Paxson, and myself set off, intending for Newark 
down the Niagara River. Dined at Queenstown, the
landing where all the goods conveyed thus far by
 water are unladen, and those intended to be re-
shipped and taken into Lake Erie are carted or car-
ried by land above the great Falls. Thence to New-
 ark, it being a newly settled town at the mouth of 
the river Niagara, containing about one hundred 
houses. It is a beautiful place opposite the American 
fort, called Niagara Fort, and just where the river 
empties into Lake Ontario which is another wonder-
ful fresh water sea in this northern country. Lodged 
at George Bradshaw's . In this place oats is 6d. per 
quart, hay 14d. per night for horses. This day's ride, 
twenty-two miles. 4th. Rode fifteen miles up the river to William 
Lunday's. Left our horses there are walked about a 
mile to a meeting appointed by Nathan Smith and 
 William Blakey , in a meeting-house near the Falls, 
called the Federal Meeting House, it being built by 
the inhabitants for any minister of any religious de-
 nomination to preach in, but I understand meetings 
are very rare in it. No Friends live hereabouts but 
William Lunday , and he, by some means, forfeited 
his right before he came here, but is kind to us. I 
thought the opportunity was owned, particularly to-
ward the close. In the afternoon William Blakey , 
Nathan Smith , and Thomas Stewardson set off for 
Black Creek; Jacob Paxson being very poorly, stayed 
at Lunday 's; James Cooper and myself went about five 
miles down the river to view a great curiosity called 
the whirlpool. On our way we met with an acceptable 
repast on excellent peaches. We came to the bank of 
 the river, which I believe is three hundred feet above 
the water, nearly perpendicular, on which we had 
a fair view of that astonishing place, the river rush-
ing with great impetuosity against the bank or wall 
of rocks at a short turn in the river and then turning 
in a cove of perhaps ten acres in which it whirls 
round and round, striving to escape at a narrow pas-
sage of perhaps one hundred yards, being all the 
opening there is between the high hills. Into this 
pool abundance of logs and timber is carried and per-
haps cannot get out for some weeks. It is amazing 
to behold the whirls that are formed, the logs sucked 
down and some time after shooting up (perhaps 100 
 yards from the place they went down, end foremost) 
fifteen or twenty feet perpendicular out of the water; 
that upon the whole it is an indescribably agitated 
place. Returned and lodged at William Lunday 's. 5th. William Lunday accompanied James Cooper 
and myself in order to take a satisfactory view of the 
great cataract. We went about three-quarters of a 
mile below the Falls and then descended a bank of 
lime-stone rocks, I suppose nearly 300 feet, which 
was not quite perpendicular, to the surface of the 
water, some times holding by roots, some times by 
 twigs, and some of the way down a ladder, other 
times sticking our toes in the cavities and holding 
by the craggy parts of the rocks. When down, clam-
bered along the rocks, logs, slabs, and timber up the 
river to the place where the water shoots over the 
rock and falls 160 feet. We went as far as we though 
was safe, being as wet, with the spray of water and 
sweat, as if we had been in a heavy shower. I had 
 an inclination to go further in behind the water, but 
Lunday said it was dangerous; for, as he said, if the 
wind were to shift against us we should be in danger 
of being suffocated with the spray and sulphur which 
smelled very strong. I though there was not quite 
so much danger as he alleged, believining he was a 
good deal timid; however, I thought best to decline, 
lest I should suffer for my temerity. On clambering 
along the rocks by the water with a wall or mountain 
 of rocks 160 feet high in some place over my head, 
hanging twelve or fifteen feet over plumb, it appeared 
truly awful and dangerous, which put me upon think-
ing what my view was in going into such apparent 
 danger, as it is evident great columns of them fre-
quently break off and fall down; but as I believed it 
was not altogether to gratify an indle curiosity, for the 
whole of the prospect led me into a reverent frame of 
mind, admiring the wonderful works, and in some 
measure adoring the Great Author, I then though if 
I should then be buried in oblivion, perhaps my soul 
was as much in a state of aspiration and adoration as 
 it might be when the unavoidable event should take 
place. This consideration led me on without much 
fear at that time, though naturally timid. I need 
not undertake to describe this wonderful phenom-
enon, as many pens have been employed in setting 
forth its magnitude; but as I have taken a view of 
the river in places many miles down, I am fully of 
the min dthat the great Falls at some period were nine 
 miles farther down the river and that they are gradu-
ally wearing up, and perhaps in time may drain the 
great Lake Erie. It is wonderful to behold the agi-
tation of the water in the rapids above the falls and 
also below them, column after column dashing 
against each other and rising a great height with 
such foaming and confusion that the whole appears 
truly awful. We were very wet when we left the 
 place; got on our horses and rode to Chippewa. Fed 
our horses and took a snatch ourselves, then rode to 
Black Creek settlement, twenty-four miles, and 
lodged at Anna Morris ', who is a kind, agreeable 
young widow. 6th. Attended the meeting at Asa Schooly 's, it 
being large for that place. After meeting we had a 
conference with the members of that meeting and laid 
before them the need we though they had of a house 
 to meet in, which they seemd spirited to build. On 
considering their circumstances,--being most of them 
new settlers and not in very affluent life,--we made 
them an offer of thirty dollars toward purchasing 
materials; but they modestly declined accepting it, 
and said they could do themselves. I have now pre-
pared things in order to set my face homewards to-
morrow, which feels very pleasant. 7th. Wm. Blakey , Nathan Smith , Jacob Paxson , 
Thomas Stewardson , and myself lodged at our kind 
friend, Asa Schooly 's, last night, who with his valued 
wife, equipped us for our journey through the wilder-
ness. Early in the morning, after taking an affec-
tionate farewell of our kind hose, I set off with Thom-
as Stewardson, and rode thirteen miles to the ferry. 
Had a fine passage over the river which is a terror to 
many, then rode three miles up the lake to the mouth of 
Buffalo creek, put up our horses and waited until all the 
rest of our company came, which is now augmented 
to the number of eleven--William Lippincott , John 
 Will and _____ Carpenter joining with us to go to the 
States. Four of us lodged at Joseph Elicot 's who was 
very kind, and gave us a good supper and breakfast. 8th. Set off from Elicot 's, it having been a very wet 
night and dull morning. Rode eighteen and one-half 
miles to where there is a large new house building for 
a house of entertainment. Fed our horses and dined 
 on our own provisions. The land the most of this stage 
an open plain full of lime-stone which doth not appear 
to me to be very valuable, the grass and herbage of 
an inferior kind; some of the way pretty good land 
covered with beech and sugar maple. From thence 
to Tonawanda, a large stream running into Lake On-
tario, 11 1/2 miles. Between those places there is some 
excellent land covered with beech, sugar maple, bass, 
black walnut, shell-bark, hickory, poplar, and divers 
other sorts of timber. Just after we crossed the 
 Tonawanda I rode a few rods to the left hand to see 
the memorable and celebrated rock under which 
Captain Lindley and his men, about two years ago, en-
 camped and lodged a very cold, wet night without 
fire; and just after I got into the road again, had the 
mortification to lose a great part of my horse-feed by 
means of the bag's coming untied and scattering on 
the ground, which my mare may have cause to lament 
in this wilderness country. Then rode eleven miles 
further to a small stream, struck up a fire and lodged 
in the woods at the east end of the White Oak Plains, 
having passed over some very poor land, some good, 
and a large plain pretty much without timber or luxu-
riant herbage. On our way this day we met many 
people moving from Bucks county and the Jerseys to 
Canada. It is amazing what numbers of people emi-
grate from those two places over the Niagara river. 
Where we have pitched our tent there are several 
other fires, at some of which are several Indians 
out hunting. They have large bundles of skins. This 
day's ride, forty-one miles. 9th. Set off early and rode to Elicot 's store-house, 
thirteen miles, having an order from him to get any-
thing ourselves or horses stood in need of. This stage 
almost all the way excellent limestone land covered 
with ash, beech, bass, sugar maple, etc., in abun-
dance; a deep soil and not so broken with the rock 
nor yet so dead a level as in some places, and is tol-
erably well watered with lively streams. Soon after 
I set off this morning, my mind became serene, 
which led me into an humble state, and thankful-
ness and gratitude to Him who hath hitherto pre-
served me and showered down many blessings and 
favors upon me, ascended from my soul, accompanied 
with strong desires that the rest of my time may be 
spent in a measure worthy of such favors. From 
thence to two new taverns just by a large spring; 
seven miles of this distance the land much as before, 
 when we came to a creek running to the left called 
Kittle Creek, just at a great fall over a large flat rock, 
called the Buttermilk Falls, then immediately en-
tered land of an inferior quality, into a large road I 
suppose opened by the State of New York, on which 
there are many new improvements. From thence 
to Parsons 's on said road, being a new tavern; pretty 
good accomodations; eleven miles. On the way we 
crossed the Genesee river, four miles form our lodging, 
it being a large stream running into the lake. On 
the west siade of said river there is a small Indian 
village on an extense of flat or plain of very rich land 
covered with high grass, I suppose some thousands of 
acres. This day's ride, thirty-six miles, in which space 
we met fifteen or sixteen wagons with families and 
many other people moving to Upper Canada. So great 
is the emigration to that government. 10th. Rode ten miles along the aforesaid road 
which is at least 100 feet wide. I was very much 
surprised to see the improvement which is made in 
 this new settled country, particularly along this road. 
I am informed it is but ten years since it first began 
to be settled; and now there is not half a mile with-
out a house, and many of them very good ones--what 
may be called elegant--many capital barns; a great 
deal of land is cleared and there are very good cattle 
in the fields. The people principally emigrated from 
 the New England states, and this is a specimen of 
their industry. When we had ridden ten miles from 
our lodging we parted, Joshua Sharples , Nathan 
 Smith, James Cooper and myself turning off the 
main road to the north in order to pay a visit to 
some Friends who are settled at a place called Mud 
 Creek. The other friends all propose to go directly 
home. We then rode eight miles to Jacob Smith 's; 
dined and rested the afternoon; here we propose to 
lodge. The most of the way from the great road 
here, appears to be a light, sandy land, thinly tim-
bered and I think may be called poor. About one 
mile before we came to Smith 's, we again came into 
rich beech and sugar maple land. Our landlord doth 
not appear to be much polished, but I believe is 
hearty in entertaining us in his way. 11th. Rode from Jacob Smith 's seven miles to his 
brother Jeremiah Smith 's. When I came in sight of 
the house, although the barn and farm looked well, 
yet the house appeared so miserable I was ready to
wish I had not come into those parts; but in a little 
while after I entered my mind was saluted with some-
thing like "Peace be to this house," and I felt myself 
very happy in company with the family, and believe 
that divers of them live near the fountains of good. 
We stayed till evening and then rode two miles to 
Abraham Lapham ' and lodged. [To be Continued.] Tenth month, 12, [1799.] On viewing the Lapham 's 
farm and things about it, (though he lives in a very 
poor house) I was astonished to see the improve-
ment made in the time; he told me it was but four 
years last spring since he began on it in the woods, 
and now he has more than one hundred acres of land 
fenced in, fields and meadows all in, either with grain 
or grass, and the most of it excellent. Has built a 
saw-mill and has a dairy of cows so good that not-
withstanding it hath been an unfavorable season, 
they have made above two thousand lbs. of cheese; 
and yet he appears with his precious wife to be well 
concerned Friends, and is free to devote much of his 
time in the service of truth. Truly in this far back 
settlement in the Genesee county, State of New York, 
the appearance of things is comfortable, and affords 
an encouraging hope that if the few Friends here set-
tled improve as well and hold up so good a light in a 
religious sense as they do in improving the wilder-
ness country, they may yet become as "a city set 
upon a hill that cannot be hid." Stayed all this day 
with these our valued and kind friends; wrote a let-
ter to Jacob Taylor , at Oneida, and walked about 
viewing the improvements Lapham has made. 
Lodged another night in his house. In the evening,
Caleb Maccumber and another friend came to see us, 
and we spent some time in agreeable converse. 13th, and first of the week. Rode two miles to 
Nathan Comstock 's, where Friends' meeting is held, 
which was large this day for such a new country. It
was a favored meeting, in which the gospel was 
preached, and near the close I could not feel easy 
without requesting an opportunity with Friends, se-
lected from others, which was readily compiled with, 
 wherein I endeavored to relieve myself of a heavy 
burden which I had silently borned ever since I came 
into these parts, on account of such a rapid increase 
of the abominable practice of distilling the precious 
 wheat into whiskey; and though I believe there are 
a few well concerned Friends here, yet doubts ac-
companied my mind that they were too easy about 
the wickedness of such a perversion of the blessings 
of Divine Providence; and I endeavored to put them 
upon nobly bearing a testimony against it, and set 
the light upon the candlestick, believing that the des-
truction or salvation of their country very much de-
pended upon the conduct pursued in that respect. 
After dinner rode seven miles to Nathan Herring-
 ton's, a kind man not in membership, but a diligent 
 attender of meetings, and there lodged, having ridden 
ten miles this day. 14th. Rode five miles through rich land and new 
road. We came to a great road, and as soon as we 
entered it we came in sight of Canandaigua, a newly 
settled town containing nearly or quite fifty houses. 
I was surprised to see such a place in this back 
country. It stands on a beautifully elevated spot, 
the buildings generally excellent, and divers of them 
would cut a very good figure on the banks of the 
 Schuylkill for a country seat. The town commands 
a pleasant prospect of a small lake about twenty 
miles long and two or three wide. We rode round 
the lower end of the lake and crossed the outlet; 
then rode nine miles to one Gilbert 's tavern, a good 
stage for horses. Greater part of said nine miles is 
 very rich land, some of the timber more mixed with 
hickory and oak than some other places; but gen-
erally through this country there is a great scarcity 
 of mill seats or lively streams. Then to Thomas 
Lee's, a kind man, his wife a member of our society; 
seventeen miles. About midway of this stage we 
 passed Judge Potter 's house and farm. The house is 
quite grand and magnificent, and was it one story 
higher would cut no inconsiderable fiture in one of 
 the most populous streets of Philadelphia. About 
two miles beofre we came to said Lee 's, we crossed a 
fine stream running to the left, being the outlet of 
Crooked Lake; and about one mile below the lake, 
at the place we crossed said stream, there is a new 
mill and saw-mill which was built by David Wag-
oner, one of the followers of Jemima Wilkinson , it 
being a few miles from her residence. Our quarters 
for ourselves and horses at this place are excellent; 
and being informed that Joseph Jones , a young man 
 brought up in Yorktown, with whom I had some 
acquaintance, lived near, I sent for him. He came
and spent the evening very agreeably to us both, and 
 as there appeared to be a few Friends and some 
Friendly people in this settlement besides some of 
Jemima 's followers, who are very tired of their ad-
herence, Nathan Smith felt a draft in his mind to 
have a meeting appointed, which was accordingly 
done, to be held in the house where we have put up, 
to begin to-morrow at eleven o'clock. This day's 
ride, thirty-one miles. 15th. Attended the appointed meeting, which was 
large considering the place, it being a memorably 
favoured time, in which the gospel was preached in 
demonstration of the spirit and with power, and I be-
lieve many hearts contrited, divers who had been 
and some who are adherents of Jemima . After 
meeting walked home with Joseph Jones ; spent the 
afternoon with him at his lodging where he has set 
up his trade at a mill known by the name of the 
"Friends' Mill," but [which] is now private property, 
and will, in time, I think, be of great value, the 
stream being large and durable, and a fall over the 
rocks of forty feet, which completely answer for a 
 dam and head race for one grist mill, two saw mills, 
and a fulling mill. Returned to lodge at the same 
place. 16th. Set off early from Lee's and rode sixteen 
miles till we came in sight of Mud Lake to our left 
hand. There Joshua Sharples , Nathan Smith , and 
 John Hill went forward, and James Cooper and my-
self took a right-hand road leading to Bath, and rode 
two miles to one Stanford 's, fed our horses, and dined. 
Just before we came to Stanford 's, Joseph Jones came 
up with us and brought forward Joshua Sharples 's 
pocket-book, he having left and forgotten it at our 
lodging. Then James Cooper followed the others 
with the pocket-book. Joseph and I rode to Bath, 
fourteen miles. The first part of this day's ride was 
chequered with good, bad, and middling land. About 
seven or eight miles before we came to Bath we 
passed the upper end of Crooked Lake, it being about 
twenty miles long and about three miles broad in the 
widest place. About two miles above the head of 
the lake, tolerably good land with improvements; 
the rest of the way to the town very poor land cov-
ered with pitch pine. The town of Bath is hand-
somely situated on the bank of a branch of the Sus-
quehanna called Cohocton, containing about forty 
houses, one of which is a court-house, in Steuben 
county. Lodged and was kindly entertained by Wil-
liam Kersey and his wife, who appeared truly glad to
see me. 17th. Set off early from Kersey 's, accompanied 
by Joseph Jones , and rode six miles to Dolson 's, where 
the rest of our company lodged, they being just gone 
when I arrived. I though they might have stayed 
a little longer to acknowledge Joseph 's kindness in 
following with the articles left behind. Thence to the 
Painted Post, twelve miles; it being a noted place, I 
 was disappointed in seeing the house and entertain-
ment. However, it was not so bad but it might be 
worse. The most of this stage was very poor, rough land. 
 Thence to the tavern known by the name of Lind-
sley's; a good stage, twelve miles. Immediately after 
leaving the Painted Post, crossed the Cohocton, a large 
stream running into the Tioga. We then rode up the 
Tioga, a long, rich bottom, and crossed it twice after 
leaving Lindsley's. Crossed the Cowanesque and the 
Tioga twice more before we arrived at Berry 's, where 
 we lodged; ten miles. This day's ride, forty miles. 18th. From Berry 's to Peter's Camp, twenty-one 
miles still up the Tioga, and crossed it six time. 
Land and timber much as before, except in many 
 places very lofty white pine. On our way we fed at 
one White 's, twelve miles from Berry 's, a newly set-
tled place, and appears as though it may in time be 
good quarters. We have now ridden about forty-two 
miles up the Tioga river, and crossed it ten times. 
Thence to the block-house, ten miles, where we fed 
and parleyed a little about staying all night. Some 
were for lodgeing there, but from the general account 
of the mischief done to travelers by the man of the 
house or some of his family, I was all along uneasy 
to stay there. The rest of my companions appearing 
disposed to stay, it being then three o'clock in the 
afternoon, however at last I gave up to stay, and then 
they changed their purpose and set off, and I with 
 them, I feeling a good deal unhappy at our entering 
a lonesome desert, not knowing whether we should 
meet with any suitable place to encamp, and two of 
our company being infirm. But on riding about 
 three miles, we came to a stream of water and there 
fixed things in order for lodging in the woods, which 
we got completed before night; and had a comfort-
able night under a tent made of bushes, by a large 
fire. My companions said the place should be called 
Coats's Camp, which name I have no doubt it will go 
by. From Peter's Camp we immediately left the Tioga 
on our left hand, and ascended a great mountain 
called the Savage Mountain., which I take to be there 
same range with the Alleghany and Laurel Hill. It 
is a great height and breadth, being twenty miles 
across the ascent, and on the top until we came to the 
place we lodged, (which is thirteen or fourteen miles), 
to the worst road I have met with on this side the 
Genesee river, being very stony, rooty, and muddy; a 
great part of it covered with hemlock. 19th. The descent down the south side pretty good 
road, but steep until we came to Trout Run, nine 
miles from the block-house, then down said run 
six miles, in which distance we crossed it twenty-seven 
or twenty-eight times, and came to Charles Reeder 's. 
Got oats and fed our horses, then left the main road, 
crossed the Lycoming and went seven miles over 
very poor, rough land to Moses Wilson 's, a Friend at 
a place called Blooming Grove. Dined and proposed 
to stay all night. Rode these two days, fifty-two 
miles. 20th. First of the week. Rode two miles to Na-
thaniel Pearson's where a small meeting of Friends 
is held by indulgence on the First- day of the week. 
Sat with them in their meeting and went home with 
 Moses Starr to dine. Afternoon rode seven miles to 
the widow Harris 's. The land and timber this day's 
ride, which was nine miles, appeared to me to be 
very poor until we came to the said Harris 's, on the 
 west branch of the Susquehanna, where there appears 
to be excellent land a considerable width from the 
river, and they have an extraordinary plantation for 
fertility with a beautiful descent from the house fac-
 ing the south. On taking a view of said farm and 
the buildings upon it, I was led to contemplate upon 
the great difference between the New England set-
tlers in a new country and those from Maryland, 
having heretofore mentioned the industry, economy, 
and intrepidity of the former. This family emigat-
ted from Maryland and appears in the house hold to 
 be in affluent circumstances. Several sons, young 
men grown, and have been settled here, I suppose, 
twelve or fourteen years; have got a good deal of 
excellent land, cleared perhaps by the blacks, but 
they have no barn nor stable fit to put a horse into; 
but have ten or twelve hounds, a tame wolf, etc., and 
I expect spend much of their time in hunting; all of 
which had a tendency to increase my partiality in 
 favor of the Yankees. But we are kindly enter-
tained here; therefore it will not be proper to cast
any reflections on their economy. 21st. Rode from the widow Harris 's to Wm. Ellis 's, 
nine miles. On the way crossed the Loyalsock. 
Rested till evening, when twelve Friends appointed 
by Philadelphia Quarter came to Ellis 's in order to 
attend the opening of a new Monthly Meeting at 
Muncy, next Fourth-day, the 23d of this month. Here 
we all lodged, being sixteen of us, they having plenty 
of room, good accommodations, and open, generous hearts. 22d. Went to get my mare shod. Returned to 
Ellis 's and lodged. 23d. Attended the opening of the new Monthly 
Meeting at Muncy, where appears a considerable 
number of well concerned Friends. Said meeting 
held till near sunset. Lodged this night at our kind 
and hospitable friends, Wm. and Mercy Ellis 's. 24th. Rode from Muncy to Catawissa, thirty miles, 
and lodged at Ellis Hughes 's. The most of the way a 
very good road; passed by a number of pretty good 
plantations though a thin soil and a great deal of 
what I call poor mountain land, covered with barren 
oaks and small pitch pine. Soon after I left Ellis 's, 
crossed Muncy Creek, a large stream; and a little 
before we came to Catawissa town, Fishing Creek, 
another large stream appeared on our left hand and 
emptied into the northeast branch of the Susque-
hanna, which opposite to said town is about a quarter 
of a mile wide. We rode through it, [it] being a lit-
tle more than belly deep. 25th. Stayed in the town and walked about with 
Ellis Hughes viewing the river and town, which 
contains about fifty houses, most of them not the most 
elegant. Near three o'clock, afternoon, James Cooper 
and myself set off, leaving the rest of our company who 
intend to attend the Monthly Meeting at Catawissa 
tomorrow, and rode fourteen miles to Ledingburg's,
 a Dutch tavern, the road being good over mountains 
of very poor land. 26th. Rode from Ledingburg's to Ricgh 's, nine 
miles; fed our horses and got breakfast; to Pensinger 's, 
eighteen miles, and dined; to James Star 's, at Par-
vin's, twenty miles, and lodged. This day's ride, 
forty-seven miles. The most of it good road over a 
poor mountain country. Crossed the Schuylkill at 
a forge in a gap of the Blue Mountains, and Maiden 
Creek, about a mile before I came to James Star 's. 
James Cooper having parted with me two miles back, 
in order to go to John Star 's, it felt very comfortable 
to be with these my old neighbors and beloved 
friends, James and Eleanor Star . 27th. First of the week. James Star accompanied 
me to Reading; attended Friends' meeting in that 
place, which is very small, six miles, and dined at 
John Jackson 's, who accompanied me to my son-in-
law's, Mark Hughes , seven miles, at Exeter. The 
pleasure I felt in meeting with my children was more 
sensible than easy to describe. [To be Continued.] BEING several years one of the committee who have 
the care of the concern and fund raised by our Yearly 
Meeting for promoting the gradual civilization and 
real benefit of the Indian natives, I have for several 
months past felt my mind drawn to visit them again 
in Cornplanter's settlement, and where some of our 
young men are residing amonst the Seneca Nation, 
at a place called Genesinguhta, in order to instruct 
them. The committee, last month in Philadelphia 
when met, believed it would be likely to be useful in 
 promoting that good work, for four Friends to be ap-
pointed to visit the before-mentioned settlement this 
season; accordingly separated Isaac Bonsal , Thomas 
Stewardson, John Shoemaker , and myself for that 
purpose. We then agreed to meet at Thomas Light-
foot's, at Maiden Creek, on the 9th day of the Ninth 
month, 1803. The morning of said day I left home in company 
with James Wilson , who is intending to accompany 
some women Friends to Upper or West Canada, in 
order to visit the members of our Society residing 
there. About noon we met Isaac Bonsal at John 
Scarlet's and arrived in the evening at Thomas 
 Lightfoot's, where we were informed all the rest of 
our company were gone forward about noon that day. [9th mo.] 10th, [1803.] Rode over a number of 
mountains to Kepler 's, formerly Rich's tavern, and 
lodged, where we fared better than we expected. 11th. Rode to Trexler 's, late Ledenburg 's, in the 
morning, where we found our friends who went be-
fore. They not being ready to set off, we left them 
 and rode to Catawissa, 23 miles, this morning before 
ten o'clock, and attended Friends' meeting in this 
place, having ridden ninety-six miles. We propose 
 to rest the remainder of this day at Ellis Hughes 's, it 
being the first of the week. On viewing the timber, 
mountains, land, and roads thus far, I think it need-
less to make any observations, finding them all to 
very nearly correspond with the former notes I made 
thereon; but have observed a number of miles back to 
 this place, the Indian corn, buckwheat, potatoes, and 
almost all other tender vegtables are generally killed 
with the frost. 12th. Our expected company all arrived last even-
ing. In the morning provided some necessaries, and 
rode this day to Wm. Ellis 's, thirty miles, at Muncy, 
 where we all propose to lodge, being ten of us. Soon 
after we crossed the northeast branch of the Susque-
hanna we found the frost had not been so severe as 
where we passed yesterday; but it is almost melan-
choly to behold in this part of the country the springs 
and streams of water to be almost wholly dried up 
and gone, even many heretofore large streams with 
no water in them, and many valuable milles are with-
out one drop, insomuch that divers of the inhabitants 
have got to boiling their wheat to eat and expect if 
the drough continues much longer it will be gener-
ally the case. At Wm. Ellis 's the women were wash-
ing and they told us they expected it must be the last 
time, except rain came, or they brought their water a 
number of miles. 13th. A wet morning. We stayed at Wm. Ellis 's 
and dined. About two o'clock p. m., Thomas Setward-
son, Isaac Bonsal , John Shoemaker , George Vaux , 
and myself, all who were going to Genesinguhta, set 
off. James Wilson , Hannah Yarnal , Mary Witchel , 
and Samuel Johnson , who propose going to Canada, 
stayed at Ellis 's. This afternoon we rode fifteen miles 
to Newberry, a small town of perhaps fifteen or 
twenty houses. Most or all of the way from Ellis 's to 
 Newberry is a beautiful road along the bottom lying 
on the west branch of Susquehanna. On our way we 
crossed the Loyalsock about nine miles from our last 
night's lodging, and the Lycoming about six miles 
farther, near Newberry, both of which are large, 
beautiful streams falling into the West Branch. The 
most of this afternoon's ride along the bottom is very 
fertile although it appears to be sandy. Near Lycom-
ing the Indian corn is excellent; I expect it will pro-
duce fifty bushels to the acre. We propose to lodge 
to-night at John Sloan 's tavern where we have had 
 an excellent supper. We passed through Williams-
port, about three miles back from Newberry, it being 
the county town of Lycoming county, containing 
twenty or more houses. 14th. Rode eighteen miles to James Kooken 's on 
Larrie's Creek, and dined. The most of the way over
 a very rough mountain called the Alleghany; some 
spots tolerable land, but I think four-fifths of it is not 
worth settling upon. Just before we came to the 
creek we entered a forest of very tall white pine 
which stands very close together, insomuch that I con-
cluded if it was all cut up in four-foot lengths it could 
 not be corded on the ground. Said Kooken has 
about fifteen acres of land cleared, which appears to 
be very fertile, having very luxuriant potatoes and 
butterweeds, also the appearance of good oats standing 
in shock and some not cut. Thence to John Norris 's 
mill, on a branch of Pine Creek, thirteen miles. After 
leaving Larrie's Creek we rode about five miles 
through very rich land exceeding heavy loaded with 
timber--mostly white pine with some hemlock, sugar 
maple, etc., and then entered a valley down which a 
branch of Pine Creek runs, which we crossed eleven 
times, and then came upon a larger branch of said 
water, crossing it several times. Up to the mill pretty 
good land in a narrow valley between two high 
mountains; no house nor improvement for ten miles 
of the last stage. At this place we have got a very
pleasant landlady who provided us a good supper. 15th. Rode to Moses Wilson 's eleven and one half 
miles; the most of the way upon a branch of Pine 
Creek, though very good land heavy loaded with 
timber, and there appears to be several new settle-
ments making which in tim may be very valuable, 
one of which is Sampson Babs 's who is making an 
improvement on a fertile spot and has got a race al-
most finished in order for a sawmill, and perhaps 
a grist mill. He appeared exceedingly elevated 
with seeing us and told us when he came there 
first, being no road, he came by direction of a 
compass, and resided twelve weeks without see-
ing the face of any person. Had only a blanket 
and piece of hemlock bark for his house and bed-
clothing. Moses Wilson and his truly valuable wife 
appear to be very happy in seeing us. He has made 
a considerable opening in the heavy timber and has 
got good corn and other things; but truly those who 
have not been in the back country can have but a 
very imperfect idea of the hardship and difficulty 
those have to endure or encounter who are the first 
settlers in a new country. Thence to James Mills 's at 
the third fork of Pine Creek, which is a boatable 
 stream about fifty-six miles above where it empties 
into the west branch of Susquehanna, and ten miles 
from Moses Wilson 's. On our way we came to a camp 
 in the woods, where we foudn Wm. Ellis with a 
Fisher & Co.'s land, said Ellis accompanying us 
six miles to said Mills 's in order to spend the 
 evening with us in friendly converse. The land gen-
erally good this stage, and some of it excellent with
abundance of very large sugar maple. Said Mills is 
 living on said Fisher's land which I think will, in time, 
be a very valuable estate. He said he had two years 
ago six hundred dozen of wheat, and the present 
year has got seventeen acres of corn, which will no 
doubt yield fifty or sixty bushels to the acre; appears 
to be a very active, intelligent man; has got twelve 
children, nine of whom live with him, who are 
very healthy and hardy. He is perhaps as successful 
 a hunter as there is in this State, and many of the 
wild beasts of the woods fall a prety to his skill, such 
as bears, panthers, elk, and deer. It is said and be-
lieved he killed eleven elk one morning before break-
fast. One of his sons, in the ninth year of his age, 
killed six elk and five deer; is now in the fourteenth 
year of his age, has killed several bears this season. 
Two of his daughters killed three elk in one day; 
 and we have this evening feasted on the product of 
their skill. Said Mills told me that he and one other 
man were out about a week and they killed in that 
time above seventy deer. 16th. Before we left Mills 's, breakfasted on coffee, 
of which we had plenty, wheat bread and butter, 
venison, both of the elk and common deer, eels, trout, 
then rode about twenty-five miles up Pine Creek, and 
 crossed it thirty-eight times before we came to the 
head, which is about eighty miles from where it 
empties into the West Branch. Almost all the way 
up it, good land in general, heavy loaded with timber, 
some of the way very lofty white pine. After we left 
the head of said creek, rode seven miles through 
very rich land and timber rather exceeding that on 
Pine Creek, to a spring, being one of the head-springs 
of the Alleghany River, where we struck up a fire, 
pitched a tent, and lodged. 17th. Rode twenty-three miles to a new settlement 
on Osweo being one of the main branches of the 
aforesaid river, where there are several neat houses 
built, which is intended for a town called Cerestown 
or Francis King's settlement. The most of the said 
twenty-three miles is excellent land, but so heavy 
loaded with timber of divers sorts, such as hemlock, 
white pine, sugar maple, cherry, and some bass or 
lynn, that it will be very expensive clearing. It is 
astonishing to see the height of the white pine, and 
other timber in proportion. Although to such as 
have never seen such timber it may seem a little 
romantic, I have seen, (particularly when we came 
near Francis King's), great numbers of trees which 
we all believe to be thirteen or fourteen perches 
high; and John Bell , a Friend of veracity, told us he 
 measured one which was 250 feet long when it fell 
down, which is fifteen perches and ten feet. Said Bell 
and his wife are Friends that came from the north of 
England, and are about settling here; [they have] a 
 good deal of very good corn; they seem to be in good 
spirits, were truly glad to see us, his wife remarkably 
so, insomuch that she was ready to weep with joy; 
is a remarkably cleanly woman and was very happy 
this afternoon in entertaining us with a good cup of 
tea sweetened with loaf sugar and good will, that I 
though the joy and happiness we were instrumental 
in communicating to this woman was almost worth 
our journey to these parts. Here we also met with 
 my old friend, Halftown , who is up here in a canoe 
with three of his children, in order to get some 
necessary tools, etc.; was just going to set off about 
fifty miles down the river to his home. He was very 
much rejoiced to see us and agreed to stay until to-
morrow to navigate us down the river to Gene-
singuhta. 18th. First of the week. Stayed at Cerestown till 
after dinner. Francis King is a plain, sober-looking
 man, but by some means he forfeited his right of 
membership with our Society before he left England. 
His wife died after he came here, leaving with him 
seven or eight children who are members. John 
and Mary Bell with six or seven children are all 
members. These two families with one or two more, 
are in the commendable practice of meeting together 
once or twice a week in order to pay the tribute 
of worship. We sat with them in their little meet-
ing and dined at John Bell 's, whose wife is a woman 
of the most exquisite sensibility; and at our depart-
ure taking leave of them [it] seemed as much as she 
could bear with becoming fortitude. After dinner, 
walked along with Halftown down the Osweo six 
miles, where it empties into the Alleghany, and he 
had left his canoe. The water being very low, some 
of us walked and others rode in the canoe turn about 
until we reached Adam Hoopes 's, fourteen miles from 
King 's. The land and timber down the river to here, 
pretty good. Said Hoopes received us very kindly in 
his cabin and treated us with the best provision he 
 had; which was venison, [and] corn, dried, pounded, 
and made into mush, with milk to eat with it. We 
all slept on the floor of his cabin before the fire, hav-
ing some of his poultry taking their repose close by 
us. He is a courteous man who owns 20,000 acres of 
land in this country, a considerable part of which is 
very good, and is now beginning a settlement just at 
the mouth of a boatable stream called Issua, which 
perhaps in time may become a very valuable estate. 
He has got a large house raised but not covered, and 
some corn standing, and perhaps eight or ten acres 
which he intends to sow wheat upon. [To be Continued.] Ninth month 19th [1803.] Adam Hoops 's brother pro-
 posing to go to Genesinguhta to get some seed wheat, 
and the river being so low that we were doubtful 
Halftown would be beset to convey us down in his ca-
noe, they kindly offered some of us a passage in their 
canoe. Accordingly Thomas Stewardson , John Shoe-
maker, and George Vaux went with him, he having 
two active young men to work it; and Isaac Bonsal 
and myself took passage with Halftown and his son, 
 having an exceedingly pleasant ride down the river, 
keeping in company all the way with the vessel 
which our friends were on board of, and another 
 canoe with one man in it going to Pittsburg. We 
sometimes sat up and sometimes lay down and slept 
between two Indians navigating us, who appeared 
very dexterous, and disposed to accommodate us in 
 every respect in their power. About twelve or fifteen 
miles down from the Issua we stopped and dined at a
place called the Plum-Orchard, it being on or near 
the upper end of the Indian reserve. I never saw 
 such a place before, it containing about forty or fifty 
acres of exceeding rich land thickly set with trees 
which are loaded with excellent fruit, and abundance 
on the ground, now in full season. I have no doubt 
but there is more than one hundred cart-loads of ex-
cellent plums on which we satiated our appetites for 
 that fruit and took some on board. Then sailed down 
the river to the mouth of the Tusquiatossy, it being twen-
ty-one miles from Issua. There we struck up a fire, 
pitched our tents and slept on the river-bank, the 
number of the passengers our squadron contained be-
ing twelve. George Vaux hitherto being our cook hath 
 performed his office to suit our palates, and this even-
ing failed not in his skill. In the night an alarm was 
sounded in our camp by a sentinel, under an appre-
hension of the near approach of a mortal enemy. 
One of our company took the alarm and immediately 
 rose; the others believing it to be the effect of imag-
ination did not think it necessary to get up, which 
ultimately proved to be the case. 20th. Breakfasted early and pursued our voyage 
four miles to the mouth of Tusquiatossy, being a 
creek (though now quite dry) that runs down what 
 is called the Little Valley. Thence to Genesinguhta, 
where we met with our beloved friends, J. Taylor , J. 
Thomas, and J. Swayne , the young men whom we 
stationed there in order to improve the natives, John 
 Pennock also being there some time, improving some 
of them in the smith- business. It was truly a very 
satisfactory meeting, particularly to them, they being 
so long from a sense of duty separated from their 
friends and relatives. Many of the Indians came to 
see us this afternoon and took us by the hand with 
evident tokens of great joy, which is a clear indica-
 tion that they are highly pleased with, and in good 
measure sensible of our disinterested endeavor to 
improve them in agriculture, mechanical arts, and 
profitable civilization. We observed, as we sailed 
down, the Indian reserve of land along the river to 
be excellent; and when we came within fourteen or 
fifteen miles of Genesinguhta, the settlements and
 improvements began to appears, and many of the In-
dians have begun to clear out and cultivate their 
ground; have built houses more comfortable than
they were formerly accustomed to. When I was up 
the river from this place four years ago, I believe 
there were but three or four settlements worth 
noticing; and now there are eighteen or nineteen, 
and divers of them have large fields of corn, con-
siderable stock of cattle, and some of them this sea-
son had wheat for sale; so that upon the whole I 
 think they have improved in agriculture beyond my 
expectations. Soon after we arrived, our friends 
showed us the copy of a speech made by Cornplanter 
 and his brother, Conudiu , on the proposal of their 
moving off the Indians' land and settling near them 
where they might have the opportunity of being in-
structed as usual and building a saw-mill, which is as 
follows: Conudiu first spoke: It is now a long time since 
you came to live amongst us; it have even exceeded 
the limits that were first proposed. I now speak the 
united voice of our cheifs and warriors to you, our 
 women also, and all our people. Attend, therefore, 
to what I say. We wish you to make your minds 
perfectly easy; we are all pleased with your living 
amongst us, and not one of us wants you to leave our 
 country. We find no fault with you in any respect 
since you came among us, neither have we anything 
to charge you with. You have lived peaceably and 
honestly with us, and have been preserved in health,
and nothing has befallen you. This we think is proof 
that the Great Spirit also is pleased with your living 
here and with what you have done for us. Friends, Tewenstee, we have been very much en-
gaged in business respecting the affairs of our na-
tion, which has prevented us from answering you 
proposals of declining the settlement at Genesinguhta 
and moving up the river to settle on land of your 
 own joining ours. We now all agree to leave you at 
full liberty either to remain where you now are on our 
land, or to move up the river and settle, on land of 
you own--only that you settle near us. The Little 
Valley is as far up the river as our people are willing 
you should go, as we want you to be near us, that you 
 may extend further assistance and instruction; for 
although we have experienced much benefit from 
you, and some of our people have made considerable 
advancement in the knowledge of useful labor, yet 
we remain very deficient in many things, num-
bers of us are yet poor. Friends, Tewenstee, I myself have been advising 
our people to pursue the course of life you recom-
mend to us, and we have fully concluded to follow 
habits of industry; but we are only just beginning to 
learn, and we find ourselves at a loss for tools to work 
with. We now request you to bring on plenty of 
all kinds you think will be useful; then such of our 
people as are able will buy for themselves, and such 
as are poor we wish you to continue to lend to, and 
they shall be returned to you again. We also want 
you to bring useful cloths and sell to us, that we may 
get some necessary things without having to go so far 
for them. In looking forward we can limit no time 
for you to live beside us; this must depend on your 
own judgment. When your friends come from Phil-
adelphia we wish you to communicate this speech to 
them as the full result of our minds concerning you. After the foregoing speech was delivered Corn-
planter spoke as follows: Friends, Tewenstee, attend. I will add a little 
further. When I was in Phildelphia, a long time 
ago, the Indians and white people at that time con-
tinued to kill each other; I then heard of Quakers, 
 that they were a peaceable people, and would not 
fight or kill anybody. I inquired of the President 
of the United States about them, whether or not this 
account was true. He said it was true enough; they 
 were such a people. I then requested him to send 
some of them to live amonst the Indians, expecting 
they would be very useful to us. Then it was a long 
time after before you came. You are now here, and 
 it has afforded me much satisfaction that you have 
come. I have not been disappointed in the account 
I heard of you. You have lived peacefully among us, 
and no difficulty has happened between you and our 
people. We now want you to stay with us and stand 
between us and the white people; and if you see any 
of them trying to cheat us let us know of it; or if you 
see any of our people trying to cheat the white we 
wish you to let it be known also, as we confide in you
that you will not cheat us. "Friends, we have now spoken so full on the busi-
ness that we need not say any more until we find one 
of you has killed one of our people, and we find him 
lying dead on the ground, or until one of us kills one 
of you; then we will take up the business again." [De-
 livered the 30th of the 8th month, 1803.] Notwishstanding this, we thought it necessary to 
see the chiefs and others in council; and being in-
formed that Cornplanter was just set out on a hunt-
ing tour, we hired an Indian to go in the night, (though 
it was a wet one), in quest of him. He set out and 
 traversed the woods, blowing his horn; and just at 
daybreak found him, who came to us early this morn-
ing which is the 21st, and 4th of the week. After 
conferring with him, he appeared very much pleased 
with our coming, and agreed to send out for the dis-
tant chiefs and others to meet us in council at this 
place next Seventh- day morning. We then set off up
the river in order to look for a suitable place to maek 
a settlement and build a saw-mill. Having viewed 
two valleys heretofore had in view, but found the 
 streams entirely dried up, we came to a fine stream 
on the east side of the river, called Tunesasau, on 
which we think there is a good mill-seat, being about 
three and a half miles from this place, and land tol-
erably good; then returned. On our way we had the 
curiosity to ascend a very high mountain in order to 
have a prospect of the river and adjacent country. 
Jacob Taylor and myself pursued our 
route until we got a grand prospect of the river and 
the adjacent country and a number of the Indian set-
tlements, and got home as soon as the others. The 
young Indian who is the smith at Genesinguhta,
whose name is Levi Halftown , went with us and re-
 turned with those who gave out; he made himself 
very merry with us when walking through the woods; 
said the Quakers were like little children learning to 
walk, and that we might now see some of the hard-
ships the Indians had to pass through in their hunt-
ing, only that it would not dor for them to stop and 
rest; but when he found I went on, said there was 
one hardy man amongst them. I think I never heard 
 Thomas Stewardson complain or give out until this 
time. In the evening Blue Eyes came; was very 
glad to see us, but was sorry he had to go to Catta-
raugus to see a sick daughter, so that he could not be 
at the council. Because he is a steady friend and pro-
 moter of our concern for the good of the natives, be-
ng a chief who both by precept and example endeav-
ors to lead them on in habits of sobriety and indus-
try, and as he could not stay with us, we took the op-
ortunity of opening to him some of the reasons of 
our coming here at this time, which was a proposal 
of our young men's moving off their land and set-
tling near them on some of their own. He was wise 
enough to see the reason of the proposal; and al-
though he saw and gave in to the propriety of it, yet 
appeared sorry, and he is a near neighbor; and said if 
they moved he would wait to see how they would do 
and then move near them. Truly the opportunity 
this evening with Blue Eyes had a tendency to pro-
duce some very pleasant sensations in my mind, and 
I thought I could own him for, and really felt him 
near, as a brother. 22d. Fifth of the week. This being the day on 
which the young men hold their meeting, we sat with 
them, which I believe was a time of refreshment to 
us all. In the afternoon walked about viewing the 
 improvements the Indians ahve made which are con-
siderable. Several of them have a good deal of corn, 
and some have raised some wheat; but I think they 
have not improved in agriculture and industry equal 
to those up the river. We saw two of them threshing
their wheat; but as they had not barn to put it in, it 
appeared to be somewhat damaged in the stack. I 
endeavored to put them upon building barns, which 
they promised to do. 23d. We all in company with Jacob Taylor , John 
Pennock and Joel Swayne , went down to Genesing-
uhta, or Cornplanter's Village, nine and a half miles. 
Being eight of us having three horses, Jacob Taylor 
and myself walked all the way and back again, being 
 nineteen miles. The others rode turn about. We ar-
rived at the village about eleven o'clock and spent 
two or three hours in viewing the Indians' houses, 
corn-fields, and other improvements; and although 
 we discovered fourteen shingled houses and abund-
ance of corn, yet I think they have not improved 
four years past, equal to the Indians up the river. We 
dined at Cornplanter 's upon the best venison I have 
eaten since I left home, Indian bread, butter, butter-
milk, bears' fat and squashes. Some of our company 
were very desirous to return before dinner; but Jacob 
Taylor told them it would not do. They then sum-
moned all the fortitude they could and sat down to 
dinner. Jacob Taylor , John Pennock , Joel Swayne , 
Thomas Stewardson , and myself at with good-will; 
the others did as well as they could. The old chief 
was very pleasant with us and made himself very 
cheerful, inquiring for Henry Simmons ; said he was 
 a man for his mind, and if he had not been a Quaker 
he would have made a very good war chief. Some 
time after dinner, we returned. J. Taylor , Thomas 
Stewardson, Isaac Bonsal , George Vaux and myself 
walked one or two miles near the river bank; the 
other three rode. On our way passed through abun-
dance of good corn and beans, and by eight or ten 
 houses, some of them very complete work, with stone 
chimneys. In one of them lives an old woman, half-
sister of Cornplanter , with three or four sons. The 
poor old woman was rejoiced to see us; said she was 
thankful to the Good Spirit for preserving us in our 
long journey to see them, and also that He put it in 
our hearts to have compassion on them; and that she
was old and did not expect to be at the council to-
morrow, but hoped the Good Spirit would preserve 
us. Truly the manner of her expression, the tears 
standing in her eyes, and the whole of her deport-
ment, expression, and appearance had a tendency to 
enliven the affectionate feelings of my heart, and I 
could not help thinking she was as much the favorite 
 of Him who sees not as man sees, as many who think 
themselves more polished. In about three miles' 
walking, Cornplanter , Conudiu , and about twenty or 
 thirty more of the Indians overtook us on their way 
up to the council. I walked very pleasantly and cheer-
fully with them. The old chief, Cornplanter, wanted 
me to ride his horse; but when I refused, he said I 
was a sachem. [To be Continued.] Friends Intelligencer 44 (1887), 452-4, 468-70, 482-4, 701-3, 514-6, 530-2. Sections labeled I-VI. Followed in FI by sections VII-XII, recording a trip in 1803. Ninth month 24th,[1803.] About 10 o'clock, many of
the chiefs and others collected and seated themselves
around a small fire which was kindled in the open
yard, and sent us word they were ready, about sixty
in number. We then went and sat with them. After
a short pause Conudiu rose and congratulated us on
our safe arrival in their country, and said they were
thankful to the Great Spirit who had preserved us in
our long journey to see them, and more which I can
not well recollect, much to the same purport. Corn-
planter then said they were ready to hear us. We
then had our certificate read and interpreted to them,
which is as follows: To Cornplanter and other Chiefs of the Seneca Nation of
Indians living on the Allegheny River; Brothers: Our friends who live amongst you inform us they have
conferred with you some time past about removing to set-
tle some distance farther up the river, on some of the land
you lately sold to the white people; which we understand
they and some of you think might enable them to be still
more useful to you than where they now live. "Brothers, we are desirous every movement we make
amongst you may be well considered and so conducted as
to always keep the chain of friendship clean and bright
between us; for which reason we think it right at this
time to send some of our brethren to help to consult and
 confer on this business, and our friends Isaac Coates, 
 Isaac Bonsal, Thomas Stewardson, and John Shoemaker, 
feeling their minds clothed with love toward you, are wil-
ling to undertake this long journey. We hope you will re-
ceive them as brothers, and listen to their words, for they
are true men and sincere friends to your nation. "Brothers, our hearts are made glad to hear from our
friends amongst you that you are beginning to live more
comfortably on the fruits of your labor, under the blessing
of the Good Spirit; and we more especially rejoice to hear
that your chiefs and young men generally refrain from
the use of strong liquors, which you know have been so
destructive to Indians as well as many white people. We
hope you will be strengthened by the Great Spirit to perse-
vere in the good resolution you have taken on this subject. "Brothers, we desire the Good Spirit may be with you
and influence you and our friends in your councils, on the
weighty subjects which may come before you; that so
everything may be settled and conducted to mutual satis-
faction and to the furtherance of our designs of being last-
ingly useful to you." We remain your friends and brothers.Philadelphia, 19th of the Eighth mo., 1803.
(Signed by) DAVID BACON, JOHN WISTAR, JOHN PARRISH, ELLIS YARNAL, OLIVER PAXSON, NATHAN HARPER, NICHOLAS WALN, JOHN BIDDLE, WILLIAM SAVERY, HALLIDAY JACKSON, SAMUEL CANBY, JOHN MORTON, JR., JOHN PEIRCE, THOMAS WISTAR, ROBERT SMITH, GEORGE WILLIAMS. After the foregoing certificate was read and ex-
plained to them, evident marks of assent were dis-
coverable, and we having concluded upon and drawn
up an address to them on the important contem-
plated removal of our young men, it was also read to
them by paragraphs and interpreted as follows: To Cornplanter and the other Chiefs of the
 Seneca Nation residing on the Allegheny River;
Brothers: You have heard the speech which our friends at
home have sent to you by us. We now wish you to
speak your minds to us quite plain, and if there is
anything which does not feel easy to you, that you
will tell it to us. Brothers, we have seen the speech made by you
to our friends who live among you, at one of your
late councils, by which we understand you leave
them at full liberty to move up the river to settle on
land joining to yours. Brothers, since we came here we have been
viewing the land, and think if the Holland Company
will sell us a piece on Tunesasah Creek that it will be
a suitable place for our friends to settle upon; they
will then still be among your settlements. Brothers, when our friends first came to settle
among you, we told you the tools they then brought
should be for your use, to be lent among such of you
as wanted to use them. They have been so lent,
and we have sent others for our friends to use.
 When our friends remove, such of the first parcel of
tools as remain with them, will be left with your
chiefs to be lent out for the good of the nation. Brothers, we have lent some blacksmith tools to
the smith who resides at the upper town; the others
our friends take with them; but the smith who lives
here may have the use of them. The two smiths we
hope are now able to do nearly all the smith-work
you will want. Brothers, if our friends get a house put up before
winter suitable for their accommmodation, they will
remove from the one they now live in. The barn
and some of the land they may want another sum-
mer, as perhaps they cannot get land enough cleared
to raise grain and hay for their cattle. You will
agree among yourselves which of you shall live here
when our friends remove. Brothers, when our friends remove they will
continue to give you assistance and instruction when
they can; if they think you stand in need of it.
Several of you have tools, and as there are some of
the first parcel which came up that are not worn out,
they will be left with the chiefs to be lent to such as
want. Many of these tools are already lent; we
think it will be best for you to appoint some person
to have particular charge and care of them, as lend-
ing tools has been very troublesome. Brothers, we understand by your speech to our
friends that you want them to bring on tools and
cloth to sell. Brothers, we do not want them to keep
a store of goods among you; we think it will not be
best; but we intend to send on a few scythes, sickles,
augers, and some such tools for our friends to sell to
such of you as may want to buy; but if any of your
people buy from them and then sell to the white
people, they are not to sell any more to such as do so. Brothers, we again repeat it, we wish you to
speak your minds freely to us, and if there is any-
thing which you and we do not understand alike,
that you will tell us, as it is our wish to comply with
all our engagements. The iron which our friends
have promised you will be sent on as soon as the
water will admit. After a little pause, Cornplanter replied: "If you
will leave us a little while, we will counsel among
ourselves and return you an answer. We then left them about an hour, when they sent
us word they were ready. We again seated ourselves
as before, when Cornplanter addressed us in sub-
stance as follows: We are all glad to see you that are now assem-
bled in council, and glad to hear what you say to us;
and your speech is good, being the same language
you have always spoken to us. We know the time is
out that was first agreed upon for your young men to
stay with us, and that nothing had been said to us
about their staying longer, and perhaps that was the
reason why they wanted to purchase a piece of land
from the Holland Company joining to ours; but they
were welcome to live where they now do as long as
they please; and if the Holland Company will not
sell you any land, we hope they will continue to live
where they now do. When your friends first came,
and for a long time after, many of the white people
told us to 'watch the Quakers well, for they are a
cunning, designing people, [and] under pretense of
doing something for you intend to get some advan-
tage of you some way or other.' But of late, finding
all was straight and no advantage attempted to be
taken, they have left off talking about it. Your
young men and we have now lived several years as
brothers. When they came here we were very ig-
norant, but are now just beginning to learn. Your
young men do not talk much to us, but when they
do they speak good words and have been very help-
ful in keeping us from using whiskey. We had de-
sired them to agree among themselves who should
live in this house, as your young men expect to leave
it before winter; but we do not think it right to fix
on any one yet, for if you cannot buy a piece of land,
they will need this place themselves; and if you do
buy a piece, they may not get a house fit to live in
before winter, and then they will want it themselves.
You have said you will leave all the buildings, fences,
farm, etc., for us to have, except the barn and some
of the land next summer to raise some grain and
hay for yourselves and cattle until you can raise it
on your new settlement; but it is hard work to cut
down so many big trees and clear the land; perhaps
they cannot get enough cleared next summer, and if
they do not, they are welcome to work this as long
as they need it. So it will be time enough to choose
one of our people to have this house and farm when
your young men are well fixed on the new place.
We will appoint some of our chiefs to receive the
tools and collect such as are lent out; to have the
charge of lending them. In our speech to your young
men we requested them to bring cloth and tools to
sell to us that we might not be cheated by the white
people. But you have come to a wise conclusion in
not keeping a general store amongst us, for perhaps
some uneasiness or dispute might arise if a store were
kept. But we thank you for your kind intention of
bringing some scythes, sickles, augers, etc., to sell to
such of our people as may want them, and are pleased
that such who buy are restricted from selling to white
people; also for the iron which you propose to give
to us, we wish your young men may divide amongst
our people, and then we can get the smiths to make
such things as we want. Brothers, we are well pleased with your conduct
toward us and having always done what you prom-
ised to do. An old chief called Mush said a few words as a
kind of acknowledgment for some little uneasiness
he had occasioned principally by his not heretofore
understanding the nature of our intention or prospect
of settling our young men amongst them, but now
appeared perfectly satisfied. Then Connewauteu 
said that we promised to endeavor to send a smith
among them; that after some time we did send one,
but he stayed a short time, and our smiths were
not fully perfect in the trade. Now you have sent a
smith, the best we ever saw; he can make every-
thing we want, but he has been here but a very little
time and now says he is going away. We wish he
 would stay all winter, and then we think our smiths
by that time, with his instruction, will be able to do
our work; but now they cannot do all we want. We replied that John Pennock, (the good smith
he meant), had a wife and children at home who re-
quired his attention, and we could not urge him to
stay from them longer than he was willing; that he
had been with them as long as we expected; but
when we got home we would mention their request
to our friends for them to consider whether they
could help them or not. And as I have heretofore and more stongly of
late felt my mind impressed with strong desires for
the benefit and improvement of the poor natives from
whom our predecessors in the first settlement of
Pennsylvania received so much kindness and assist-
ance, at times [I] felt a flow of good-will towards
them, and the rest of my brethren present having
desired me to reply to them, I addressed them in sub-
stance, as follows: Brethren and friends attend. It is now a great
many years since our forefathers, the Quakers, came
 over the great water and began to settle in that part
of this country called Pennsylvania. At that time
the Indians were very numerous and we were but
very few. The Indians were kind to our forefathers,
helped and assisted them in the wilderness. Love
and confidence were kept alive towards our fathers
and the Indians a great many years, and they were
at peace with each other; but after some years a great
many other people came over the great water and a
great many were born here who were not so peace-
able and did not love the Indians so much as our
fathers did, who were the first settlers. And as these
people became numerous, for a good while [they] had
a share in the great councils in Pennsylvania; and at
length as our fathers, the Quakers, were altogether
for peace, and the others became the more numerous,
they took the great councils of the State affairs in
Pennsylvania into their hands; many of these were
very desirous of having the Indians' lands, and as
fast as they could kept driving them back. Then In-
dians began to kill white men and white men to kill
Indians. All this time the Quakers loved the In-
dians and did not kill any of them, but were very
sorry the Indians and white men did kill one another,
but could not help it; and [during] the long time of
Indians and white men being at war and killing one
another, treaties were often appointed, and although
the Quakers had no power over either the Indians or
whites, yet some of them almost always attended the
treaties to try to keep the Indians from being cheated
out of their land or other things. The wars and
troubles continued at times between the Indians and
whites, until about ten years ago when there seemed
to be a general peace agreed upon between the In-
dians and white people in this country. Soon after
that, at one of our great councils in Philadelphia,
where there were a great many hundred Quakers
present, we remembered our Indian brothers, whose
fathers were so kind to our fathers, and on whose
fathers' lands, (which once belonged to them), we
now live so comfortably; and our Indian brothers
being driven back, we counciled amongst ourselves
to know what way we could do them the most good.
We then thought if we would raise a great deal of
money--and give it to them, they would soon waste
it and spend it for whiskey and in other ways which
would do them no good at last. Then we concluded
to ask leave of the President of the United States to
try to help our Indian brothers. The President ap-
peared to love the Indians and gave us leave; and as
we knew that by clearing and cultivating our land we
had got to live comfortably, we thought it would be
best to get some of our sober, industrious young men
to come out and live amongst them and endeavor to
teach them to clear and farm their land so that they
might live comfortably as we do on ours. It is now
several years since some of our young men have been
living amongst you. Now, brothers, it rejoices our hearts to find that
the Good Spirit has preserved our young men
amongst you and that we see signs of industry taking
place; many of you are beginning to build better
houses and clear out your land, raise more corn, as
well as cattle and wheat, particularly up the river.
Brothers, you may be assured that we do not want
anything from you for all that we do for you, neither
your skins, your furs, your land, nor anything else
that you have; only that you should attend to the
counsel and instruction of our young men who live
among you. Brothers, it made our hearts glad when
we heard from our young men that the Seneca nation
of Indians, more especially on the Alleghany River,
had taken up the resolution to banish whiskey and
other strong liquor from amongst you; we wish you
to be strong in your resolution and join together as
one man against this mighty evil; and when any of
your young men are out hunting or otherwise met
with white people that offer it to them, be sure to re-
fuse, for when a man drinks some he mostly wants
more and more until he gets drunk; and when that
is the case either with white people or Indians, they
mostly neglect their business; their wives and chil-
dren often suffer for want of necessary things.
Brothers, there are other things that do a great many
white men much harm, which are gaming, playing
cards and laying wagers; whereby many of them
not only spend their time unprofitably, but often lose
almost all that their wives, children, and themselves
should have to live upon. We wish you not to fall
into any of these practices, but to live sober, indus-
trious lives; and then the Good Spirit will love and
preserve you. But if you will get drunk and be
wicked, you will feel sorrow and trouble in your own
hearts for it. After which a letter from John Parrish to Corn-
planter was read, which mentioned this desire,--that
they might follow the counsel we gave them; that
they would have the ox instead of the buffalo, the
hog instead of the bear, and the sheep instead of the
deer. Cornplanter then replied it was very true if we
had given them a large sum of money it would all
have been gone before now and they would have
been none the better; and he appeared quite elevated
with John Parrish's prospect of their having domestic
animals instead of the wild, and said very pleasantly
that he should soon be an old man leaning on his
staff and could no more go out to hunt, and if they
followed our advice he would then never want fresh
meat--he could have it at the door and not have to
go to the woods for it. Then the chiefs and divers of
the young men took us by the hand and with great
marks of affection concluded the council. [To be Continued.] Ninth month 24th, [1803], (Continued). On meditat-
ing on the occurrences of the day and what we have
seen and heard and felt since we came amongst them,
I felt a secret satisfaction to spring in my heart, ac-
companied with a belief that the Everlasting Father
and Care-taker of men owns the concern for the im-
proving of these inhabitants of the wilderness, and
that their understandings were more clearly opened
to see into the nature, utility, and disinterestedness
of our labor, expense, and concern for their improve-
ment. Last evening our horses came, we having sent
three Indians for them last Fourth-day to Francis
King's, near sixty miles from hence, where we left
them. We were glad to see them, though they ap-
pear to be more worsted than if we had been riding
them every day. 25th. and fist of the week. Sat with our young
men in company with Steven, the blacksmith, up the
river, in their meeting which was silent. 26th. A rainy morning; we threshed and winnowed
six bushels of oats for [the use of] our horses
[going] through the wilderness to Cattaraugus. 27th. We all set off, in company with Jacob Tay-
lor, and rode through the wilderness to a spring on a
great mountain and encamped, having a fine day to
ride, and at night to lodge under our tent, it being
the same place where I lodged four years ago,--a most
 tremendous night with rain and wind. Here we met
with Blue Eyes who lodged with us; it being twenty-
five miles; almost all the way excellent land. 28th. Rode twenty miles to the Seneca village on
 Cattaraugus, passed through the village of Delaware
Indians, and propose to lodge with the chief warrior
 of the Cattaraugus Senecas. I described the land and
timber of this day's ride, heretofore, which upon a
second view I think was not exaggerated. Arrived
here about three o'clock. Although some of our
company, for a considerable time in the forepart of
our journey, appeared somewhat delicate as to food
and lodging, I find almost any person of common un-
derstanding by constant practice in any kind of busi-
ness becomes in good measure perfect; so we all ap-
pear to be approaching towards a reconciliation with
our present allotment. The chiefs of this settlement,
being scattered so that we could not get them to-
gether this evening, we concluded to have them col-
lected to-morrow. 29th. About ten o'clock, forenoon, seven or eight
chiefs, with perhaps ten or twelve young men, or
what they call "warriors," collected in the chief war-
rior's house; and, after a short pause, Lieutenant Jo 
opened the council with a congratulatory speech to
this effect: Brothers, we believe it was consistent with the
mind of the Great Spirit, that we should meet here
to-day. We thank the Great Spirit for preserving
you in your long journey to see us; and it is quite
plain to us that he intends to do us good, because he
has put it into the hearts of the Quakers to come and
see us, and to instruct us; and now you are come,
have found us, (and we have met you), all in good
health, our hearts are so filled with thanks to the
Great Spirit above, and to you, that we can not ex-
press it. Then Teconondee , or Flying Arrow, the principal
sachem of this village, arose and addressed us to this
import: Brothers, we are thankful to the Great Spirit for
opening the way for us to meet here to-day. Our
hearts are made glad when we remember the Great
Spirit has put it into the hearts of our brothers to
take notice of us; for we are a poor, destitute people,
our lands being almost all gone, and we hope you will
excuse, or not think hard of us, when we open our
 helpless situation to you. We have sent for Jacob
Taylor to give us some advice about our saw-mill, it
being out of order. Now we are convinced the Good
Spirit approves of our request, and has a mind to do
us good, because he has so ordered it that our
brothers, some of the Quaker chiefs, have come along
with him. Brothers, we have been made glad when we
heard from our brothers, the Quakers, that they were
 willing to take three or four of our boys and instruct
them in farming and other useful training and occu-
pations. Brothers, we are very thankful to you for
your kind offer, and we have been counselling among
ourselves and trying to get some boys about the age
of fifteen, that will be of good dispositions and in-
genious in learning; for we think if we could get
some of them instructed as you are, they might be
very useful to our nation, not only in teaching others,
but in keeping our accounts, so that we may not be
cheated. Brothers, we find this is a very hard thing
 to come at. We have a good many boys that would
do, but their relations think so much of them they
 cannot bear to part with them; but here is one, a
nephew of mine, fifteen years old, who is willing to
 go, and is a fine boy. His father and mother are
also willing; but his grandfather and his uncle refuse
 to let him go, and say they cannot part with him, so
we must give him out for the present, for it is of the
 utmost importance to us to maintain harmony in our
nation. There is one about nine years old that I
 would be glad you would take; he is a fine boy. Then the chief warrior, Wau-un-de-guh-ta ,ad-
dressed us; although they were not in a very florid
style, yet his remarks appeared, and we fully believed
them, to be the product of an honest and sincere
heart; to this effect: Brothers, I hope you will not think hard of us
when we open our hearts to you, for we are a poor,
 destitute people, and our land is now so nearly all
sold that we have but a little left for every family;
 and the deer is become very scarce, so that we often
may hunt all day and have nothing at night. Broth-
 ers, our hearts rejoiced when we heard the Quakers
were taking pity on us, although we could scarcely
 think there was any people who would do so much
as you are doing for us, without being paid. But
 now we are convinced that the Quakers have the
good of our nation at heart, for we see you have sent
 some of your young men to the Allegheny River to
teach the Indians to farm, without asking any pay
for it; and we see that many of our people are
learning. They live much better than formerly, and
we have seen so much of the conduct of your young
men that we can rely upon them; and we have found
Jacob Taylor to be a true man. Brothers, we are
 ashamed to ask what we are now going to ask of you,
 but our necessity makes us willing. We cannot ex-
 pect you to do so much as to send any of your young
men to live among us; but we think if you would
 send us a set of smith's tools, we have a young man
that has learned at Genesinguhta, that can do our
 smith work. Now we have to go above thirty miles
to get it done and often have to wait near a week be-
fore we can get it done. And we are determined to
get to farming, working our land, and to raising wheat
to support our families. Brothers, you have done a
 great deal for us in sending us saw-mill irons which
have been of great use to us; but our saw-mill is out
of order, and that is the reason we sent for Jacob
 Taylor to show us how to mend it, as he is a man we
can confide in. But, brothers, do not think hard of
us if we should ask one thing more, for the Great
Spirit has blessed you with wise hearts and you are
become rich; and that is we have but one plow and
many of us are desirous of becoming farmers and
sow wheat, but cannot get a plow. If you would send
us another set of plow-irons, we have two good yoke
of oxen and a number of horses, then we think we
 could do pretty well. Brothers, we have heard your advice or counsel
to us in time past to refrain from drinking whiskey.
We thank you for it, for we see if we do not, we shall
 come to nothing; and, brothers, you sent us a letter
four years ago wherein you told us that if we did not 
leave off drinking whiskey you would be discouraged
from trying to help us, but if we would leave off and
become sober men, you would be encouraged to as-
sist us as you could. That letter we have yet. [They
then produced the letter to us and we found it was
written by Thos. Stewardson and myself, and our
 names were signed to it]. Now, brothers, we are
often counselling together about it, and are determ-
ined to refrain from the use of it, and although some
few of our young men sometimes break over our res-
olution, we think we are gaining ground or strength
in the good undertaking; and of all the chiefs and
warriors that are now present, we believe not one has
been drunk for more than two years past, and some
for a longer time than that, and divers of us have not
 drunk any; so we are encouraged to be strong in full
hope that we shall banish it altogether. In the evening the chief warrior's daughter, who
is an amiable young woman, came home from a visit
 at Buffalo, accompanied by a young man her rela-
tion. On their way they discovered a young deer
about half-grown, in the edge of Lake Erie, which
they chased with their canoe and killed with their
setting poles and brought it home. Some of the
 meat added to the satisfaction of our supper. After
their arrival, Wau-un-de-guh-ta introduced his daugh-
ter to us all, one by one, holding her by the hand;
and she without any appearance of unbecoming shy-
ness shook hands with us all, in a modest manner,
which altogether appeared so becomingly polite that
we could not help noticing it with peculiar pleasure.
On taking leave of him in the morning, he in a
weighty and feeling manner expressed: "We are
glad you have stayed two nights with us, and I hope
the Great Spirit will look down upon you and pre-
serve you in your long journey, and favor you with a
clear sky, so that you may get home in good health
 and find your wives and children so." We then withdrew a few minutes to confer upon
their proposals and requests, and soon returned to in-
 form them what we agreed upon. John Shoemaker 
rose and informed them
 that we believed it would not
be best to send one boy only, because he would be likely
to feel himself lonesome and so become uneasy;
neither did we think it would be best to send one
younger than 13 years, lest when the older one had
served out his time and had gone home, the younger
one would be uneasy. But if they could get two or
three boys of good disposition and near of an age who
 would be willing to come and work as some of our
children do, we should be willing to accept of them
 and use our endeavours to instruct them. Then Thomas Stewardson informed them that
although we had not proposed to do any great matters
for them, yet as they appeared desirous of improv-
ing, we were willing to assist them a little, and would
send them a pair of bellows, an anvil, vise, and some
other tools to begin with, if they thought Sam Jemi-
son, (who has been instructed in the business at
Genesinguhta), would come and do their work; also
we would furnish them with one hundred lbs. of iron,
a set of plow-irons, and some steel to begin with. Wau-un-de-guh-ta then replied: "You are wiser
than we, and we believe have come to a good conclu-
sion about the boys, and we think we shall be likely
to get two pretty near of an age in a few weeks, who
will be willing to go, and whose parents and rela-
tions will consent to their going. And if any of our
boys are sent, we want them taught to work as your
children are; for it will be of very little use for them
just to learn to read and write if they do not know
how to work. During almost all the time of the council, I think
that notwithstanding they are a very dirty, mean
people in and about their houses, cookery, etc., I
never felt a greater flow of near affection to any
people, accompanied with what I took to be an as-
 surance that their souls are as precious in the eyes of
Him who is impartial in judging of the inmost re-
cesses of the heart, as ours are who have been blessed
with so many inexpressible favours; (I fear too often
with but little sense of gratitude; to the Great
 Spirit for influencing our hearts to take pity on them,
and to us in manifesting our kindness, insomuch that
I could not suppress a flow of tears; and although a
good deal had been said on both sides, it being likely
I should never have the same or a like opportunity,
I thought I could not leave them easy without en-
deavoring to open to them the real cause of our com-
 ing; the origin of the concern which the Society is
engaged in for their good; that the good men in our
Society always loved our Indian brothers, and during
the whole time the white people and Indians were at
war and killing one another, we had no hand in it nor
could not be at war with anybody, but were sorry for
it. And although we had no outward power in our
hands, generally when treaties were appointed be-
tween the white people and themselves, some of us
attended to try to keep them from being cheated. And when the war was over we were willing to try
to help and instruct them. With much more similar
to what I expressed in the council at Genesinguhta,
 relative to the bad effects attendant upon the use of
ardent spirits both upon white men and Indians,
 with a strong recommendation to them to endeavour
to avail themselves in every respect of the opportu-
 nity put into their power of improving the little good
land they have left, and following the advice and ex-
 ample set and given them by our young men who re-
side with their brother Senecas on the Allegheny
River. Also I informed them that Jacob Taylor in-
tended to stop on his return from Buffalo and view
their saw-mill. And although we were desirous of
getting forward this afternoon, on our way to Buffalo
Creek, and made attempts to conclude the council,
they were so pleased with our company that it
seemed too hard for them to part with us; and the
chief warrior said he was sorry and ashamed they
 were not in a capacity to entertain us better, but if
we would be so kind as to stay another night with
them they would do the best they could, and Flying
 Arrow said he would bring as much corn as our
horses could eat. For my part, I was not in a ca-
pacity to refuse their request and told my companions
I would rather stay with them until the next morn-
ing. To this they all consented and we informed
them so. They seemed much rejoiced; the chief
warrior saying we had made the hearts of their
women and children glad, and some more of them
would be glad to take us by the band. Flying Arrow 
soon sent us plenty of corn, and his father cut corn
tops enough and brought to our horses. The chief
warrior's wife exerted herself in doing all she could
for us. After the council was concluded and the most of
the Indians gone, also Harry, who was our interpreter,
I had a good deal of very friendly conversation with
Wau-un-de-guh-ta , (our landlord), Jacob Taylor in-
terpreting. I soon found there were such impres-
sions made upon his mind that it has opened a door
to a large scope of inquiry; and I believe many
things appeared in a fresh or new light to him. I
discovered him for some time to be in a deep study;
at last he said there was one thing he wanted to ask
but was afraid the question would not please us. We
 told him he might ask anything. He then said,
some time ago when he was at the Federal City, on
his way there he saw a great many black men that
were slaves to white men and looked miserable; and
he wanted to know whether the Quakers kept any of
them. We told him we did not, and did not think it
right. He seemed very much pleased. Many things
more he asked; [so] that truly the undissembled ap-
pearace and conduct of this man and his wife made
very pleasant impressions on all our minds. [To be Continued.] EARLY in the morning on the 30th [of 9th month,
1803] we all set off and rode to New Amsterdam, at the
 mouth of Buffalo Creek,which is about thirty-three
 miles, eight of which is mostly bad road or path
through the woods to Lake Erie; the other part of
the way is down the lake on the margin. A very
pleasant ride, although each time I have ridden it I
have been affected with the headache. A material
change appears to me to have taken place on the
margin since I was along it four years ago. The
beautiful beds of lime-stone are generally covered
with sand, and much of the best kind of slate very
much gone. When we arrived at Amsterdam, Red
Jacketand several other Indian chiefs were there
along with the mill-wrights who say they have com-
pleted the saw-mill for the Indians and want their
 pay. We sent for some of them and desired to know
whether we could have them personally in council
 to-morrow at their village. Red Jacket informed us
they would be glad if they could comply with our
desire, but hoped we would have patience, for they
could not well meet us to-morrow, but would meet
early the next day. We then conferred together and
 Isaac Bonsal and George Vaux were most easy to go
over the Niagara river to-morrow in order to be at
 the meeting at Black Creek the next day, Thomas
Stewardson, John Shoemaker, and myself were most
easy to stay in order to attend the proposed council
on First-day morning. Tenth month1st, and seventh of the week. Jacob
Taylor and myself went twelve miles up the Buffalo
Creek to see the new saw-mill that is built for the
Indians, (we some time past having made them a
present of all the iron), divers of the chiefs and one
 of the undertakers attending. I discovered it to be
an excellent seat, and it appeared to be a strong mill;
 but upon trial in our presence it was far from answer-
ing our expectations according to the contract, by
 not sawing half as fast as we believed such a stream-
head and fall would do if the workmanship had been
effectually executed. The chiefs said they were
ready to pay off the contract if we would say it was
well done, according to contract; and on our confer-
ring with the rest of our company the next day, we
 advised them not to pay off the contract until it was
completed. As I rode this twelve miles up the creek
 and back again through the Indian reserve I think a
great part of it is equal if not superior to any piece
 of land of equal quantity I ever saw. I believe there
are more than a thousand acres upon which there
might have been more than two tons of hay to the
acre mowed and made the present year. 2d, and first of the week. In the morning we set
off and arrived at the Indian village, in their council
house, about eleven o'clock; but we had to wait until
near four in the afternoon before what we thought a
competent number collected. They generally appear
to be a more indolent, careless, and some of them
intemperate people than those at Allegheny and Cat-
taraugus, a few instances excepted, particularly one
called the Young King and another called Pol-
lard, who are sober, temperate men, and as intent
 upon being farmers as any we have seen. The Young
King having cleared and plowed a good deal of land,
has several horses, a very good yoke of oxen, and
seven milch cows; and it is said Pollard rather ex-
ceeds him. I hope their example may induce many
more to follow them, there being the greatest num-
ber on this reserve of any in the Seneca nation.
When the Young King, Red Jacket, Farmer's Brother, 
Pollard, Jack Berry, and five or six other chiefs were
 collected with some young men and women, we pro-
posed either going back or opening the council. They
then went in the council house and after sitting a
short space, Thomas Stewardson in a brief manner
informed them the reason of our coming into their
settlement; and although there did not appear to be
 the same desire of improvement in many of the In-
dians in this settlement as those we have been at be-
fore, which I believe is much owing to the opportu-
nity they have of being corrupted by the example of
white people at New Amsterdam, which is a very dis-
sipated place, yet he felt encouraged to endeavor to
stimulate them to industry and to refrain from spirit-
uous liquors. It was not a very comfortable, animat-
ing time as yet with them, yet I was not easy to omit
opening divers matters to their consideration in a
summary way, which contained a good deal of the
heads of what I mentioned at the other places; which
seemed to attract their attention. I also informed
them I had seen a good deal of the land contained
 in their reserve that is excellent; and if they would
be industrious they might live well; but if they would
not, but followed the practice of drinking, they would
lose the little good land they now have, their wives
and children would have to lie down under the snow
and go to sleep without anything to eat or to keep
them warm. John Shoemaker advised them to settle farther
 up the creek, where the land is so very good, and not
strive to huddle together so close; which advice
seemed to please them very well. Red Jacket then addressed us in a polite and mas-
 terly manner in which he displayed his talents as an
orator in a methodical and flowery style near half an
hour. He took in every part of the advice commu-
nicated to them by us, in regular order, and para-
phrased upon it, with the frequent expression of
thanks to the Quakers, recounting their kindness to
the Indian from the first settlement of Pennsylvania;
and concluded with endeavoring to assure us if we
would come and see them two years hence, we should
find them much improved in farming, and also in
the disuse of whiskey. And notwithstanding I be-
lieved his speech was calculated to endeavor to please
us, and that there was much less sincerity or reality
in his intentions than in those of whom we have
conferred with before, yet I could have sat, I think,
patiently two or three hours to hear him exert his
smooth, oily, oratorical abilities. We then left them. Young King and Pollard in
a particular manner parted with us very affectionate-
ly. Returned to our lodging at a tavern in New Am-
sterdam, this being the third night. 3d. Thomas Stewardson and Jacob Taylor set off
for Batavia in order to see J. Ellicot, in order to agree
upon Tunesasa Creek, and also to pay a visit to the
Indians at the Tonnewanto. John Shoemaker and
myself rode down to the ferry on the great river Ni-
agara, and crossed in six minutes. There I saw three
 Mohawk Indians carry a bark canoe a considerable
distance and put it in the river, then five of them
got in it and rowed across
 in five minutes; said river
is said to be above a mile wide. We then rode to the
mouth of [the] Chippewa, fed our horses and took a
snack, at which place there was a British officer who
was formerly stationed in the neighborhood of the
great Falls, but is now fixed at York, over Lake On-
tario. He being on his way up to Long Point on the
Grand River, he was so much pleased to be in com-
pany with a couple of Quakers that he politely offered
to accompany us to the Falls and show us the way
down. As we rode down the river in view of the
 rapids we met I. Bonsal and G. Vaux who had been
taking an upper view. They turned back with us
and we all went to the ladder where the curious are
accustomed to go down, the officer leading the way;
 but the tremendous appearance of the way down
discouraged John Shoemaker from attempting it.
The rest of us followed the officer down and then up
the craggy, slippery way to the edge of the great
shoot of water; which together with returning is a
laborious task, for a believe there were but very few
 dry threads, either linen or woollen, upon any of us
when we returned. I having four years ago had a
view and given some description of this amazing cat-
aract, need not write much now. While I was view-
ing this superlatively grand and most astonishing
natural curiosity of the kind in the known world, my
 curiosity would have been fully satisfied had it not
been for one reflection or consideration, which was
that I knew my wife had a great desire to enjoy the
 view I was then favored with, which made me feel as
though I was only half satisfied. We returned to
Chippewa and lodged, having ridden twenty-four
miles this day. 4th. We set off and rode down the river by the side
of the rapids above the Falls for a little more than a
mile and then took another view of the great phenom-
enon; and I think this morning, the whole of the
prospect appeared more astonishingly great and beau-
tiful than I had ever seen it before, it being a clear
morning, and viewing the great fall and the dash-
ing of the huge and confused rolls of water over the
rocks in the rapids between us and the sun, to be
sure appeared amazingly grand and gratifying. We
then rode four or five miles to view the whirlpool,
which four years ago I thought as great a curiosity as
the other; yet I was disappointed now, though it ap-
peared a wonderful place, but very far inferior to
what it did then; there being but few logs in it, and
whether it was owing to the stillness of the day or
from some other cause, I know not, there did not
appear the sucks formed taking down the logs, nor the
very great agitation there was then. We then rode to
Wm. Lunday's ; dined; and thence to John Taylor's at 
Pelham, where we met with James Wil-
son, Isaac Bonsal, and myself, who went to Jeremiah
Moore's. Rode twenty-three miles to-day. 5th. Attended the monthly meeting of Friends at
Pelham, which myself and others had established in
the year 1799. I remember it was a subject of great
weight with me at that time, being impressed with
some serious doubts that the members which were
 to compose said monthly meeting were furnished
with religious experience or skill enough
 to be in-
trusted with power to judge of the fitness of persons
to be received into membership, or to deny from the
privileges of the Society. And although there now
 appear to be more in number than there were at
first opening, and some rather more experienced, yet
I apprehend they still remain in a very infant and
unskillful state. Isaac Bonsal, John Shoemaker , and
I endeavored to draw their attention by querying
with them whether they were easy to remain in a
careless situation respecting the foul channel in which
they receive or obtain the titles for their lands, or
whether it would not be better to apply for redress.
Some of them at first expressed they thought it was
a matter of no consequence, but others expressed
their dissatisfaction. At length they united in desir-
ing that the Yearly Meeting, or Meeting for Suffer-
ings, might take the matter upon their behalf.
Lodged at John Taylor's . 6th. Isaac Bonsal , John Shoemaker , George Vaux ,
and myself rode to Queenstown and dined; then
 crossed the great river Niagara where it is not half a
mile wide, but we were told the depth hath hitherto
been unfathomable. It looks a terrifying place to
cross; the water appears nearly as green as grass and
whirling round, I suppose occasioned by the great
rocks in the bottom; this being the place where I
apprehend the great Falls at some period exhibited the
grand appearance they now do up the river miles away.
We got over safely and in about five miles came to the
Tuscarora village of Indians, where I met with Jacob, 
the Indian, who learned the smith trade with John
Pennock. He appeared much pleased with seeing us. A
number of other Indians were helping him to put up
a coal pit. He told us his cousin learned first, and a
great many of the white people from Queenstown
 and Niagarabrought their smith work to him. From
his appearance and disposition of industry, I thought
our expense and trouble in educating him were well
spent. Then rode to one Beech's in the wilderness,
 where we met with two families from Cattawissa, one
of which was Ezekiel James's , who were moving to
Yonge street in Upper Canada . We all lodged in this
cabin, being twenty-three of us besides the family;
having ridden thirty-three miles this day. 7th. Rode forty miles to Batavia. All the way
except one or two cabins and a few settlements a lit-
tle before we came to the town, this day's ride was
all through the Holland Purchase, and a good deal of
it very good land, especially near Batavia which is
the county town of a new county called Genesee,
containing about twenty-five houses, a large court-
house and jail. When I was through this country
four years ago, there was no settlement or improve-
ment from Buffalo to the eastern transit line of
the Holland land--which is above fifty miles. It is
surprising how the Eastern or New England men
open the woods and settle, it being chiefly men from
those states who emigrate into this new country; and
although I think the land in general is equal to what
I conceived it to be when here before, there is one
very discouraging consideration which is the great
scarcity of water, we having ridden in one place to-
day twenty-five miles without finding any for our-
selves or horses, and in general very scarce. But it
 hath been an uncommon drought at this place. Joseph
Ellicot lives here. We met with Thomas Stewardson ,
Jacob Taylor being gone home. Thomas informed
us they had agreed with Ellicot for the land on Tune-
sasa Creek, which we had pitched upon for our young
men at Genesinguhta to settle upon. Here we lodged,
having ridden forty miles to-day. [To be Concluded next week.] Tenth month 8th [1803]. This morning George
Vaux's horse appeared to be very much amiss, but we
all set off early and rode six miles to a good tavern
where the store-house formerly was. Breakfasted
and fed our horses; but when we set off it was thought
by us all [that] George Vaux's horse would not be able
to travel so as we might reach the meeting of Friends
at Mud Creek to-morrow. We then unanimously
agreed for Isaac Bonsall and me to go forward in order
to reach the meeting, and the others to get along as
well as they could, and all of us to meet next Third-
day evening near the outlet of Crooked Lake. We
two then rode on and crossed the Genesee River and
thence to General Hall 's tavern, where we had good
 accommodations; it being thirty-six miles from Ba-
tavia. 9th and first of the week. Set off early and rode
about twelve miles to Jacob Smith 's and got break-
fast; he and his daughter accompanying us about six
miles more to the meeting heretofore called Mud
Creek, but which is now called Farmington, that be-
ing the name of the township. And they have now
a monthly meeting, which is held the fifth day of the
week before the last First-day in every month. I
was glad to meet with divers Friends with whom I
had formerly spent some time very agreeably. The
meeting appears to be very much increased since I
was here before. It was silent to-day. We dined at
Nathan Comstock's and then rode to Abraham Lap-
ham's, where a considerable number of the Friends
of the neighborhood came and spent the evening with
us; amongst whom were Joseph Jones and wife, he
having purcased [land] and living near here. Upon
the whole it was a very agreeable and satisfactory
evening. Many subjects of a religious nature were
conversed upon which I believe ended to mutual sat-
isfaction; and I think I was not mistaken when here
before, when I believed if they improved in a religious
sense according to their activity and talents, they
 might be a shining light in this fast settling northern
county of good land. This day, twenty miles. 10th. Spent this [day] in order to let our horses
rest and get some of our linen washed. We took the
 opportunity of walking to see some friends and view
the improvements made by these Eastern people,
which exceed what can be conceived in the idea of a
 Pennsylvanian or more southern man, for the time.
They seem as if there were scarcely anything too hard
or too heavy for them to undertake and go through
with, especially in opening a new country heavily
timbered. Said Lapham , though he does not appear
a robust man, has made a surprising improvement
for the fime he has been settled here which is about
eight years; and although there has been an uncom-
mon drought in this country this year, they have made
250 cheeses this summer, many of which will weigh
fifty pounds, and but very few less than thirty pounds,
 which, to be sure, in their cheese-house has a beauti-
ful appearance. Although I have such an opinion of
the Eastern men in opening the wilderness, I think
they are far short of a good Pennsylvania farmer in
keeping their farms in good order after they have them
cleared. We propose to lodge another night with these
our kind friends, Abraham and Esther Lapham, who
seem disposed to do everything they can to accommo-
date us. The neighbors hereabouts have been two
nights and one day collecting and bringing their hogs
to Lapham's, and to-morrow morning they propose to
set off with 250 of them about seven or eight miles into
the woods to feed upon the acorns and beech nuts
 which are very plenty, and have agreed with four per-
sons to stay in the woods with them, night and day,
for about two months; these they call hog shep-
herds. 11th and third of the week. Joseph Jones came
early this morning to Lapham's and set off with us
 and rode through a body of rich land thirteen miles
to Canandaigua, [this] being a most elegant and beau-
 tiful town here in the woods, containing near one
hundred houses, many of which are truly grand. It
stands near the outlet of a beautiful lake, about
eighteen or twenty miles long and two or three wide.
We crossed the outlet and rode four or five miles up
the side of the lake, and then generally through the
woods, except some few settlements, to Judge Pot-
ter's, eighteen miles, where we got our horses well
fed and a good dinner, free of cost. Said Potter has
an elegant house and good farm; I suppose two hun-
dred acres of excellent land cleared, and a stock of
cattle of superior kind. We then rode five miles to
 Morris Shepperd's , near the outlet of Crooked Lake
in Jerusalem, in Jemima Wilkinson's settlement; said
Shepperd being first cousin to Nathan Shepperd , late
of Philadelphia. Here we came up with Thomas
Stewardson, John Shoemaker , and George Vaux 
 and propose to lodge here. George's horse holds
out. Thirty-six miles. 12th, We all set off, Joseph Jones still accompany-
ing us, and rode twenty-three miles to Bartel's mill,
where we got an excellent dinner. Here we met with
Thomas Clark , the turnpike man, who appeared in
distress. Said three of his children were dead, and
the other one had been very bad, and [was] not quite
well. His wife had lain sick and in distress for nearly
three months, and had not yet the use of all her
 limbs. She now says she would not stay in this
country for all the land in it; so he proposes to try
to move her and his one child into our neighborhood
 again. The most of the way from Jerusalem here,
 is their land. We rode in the morning several miles
in sight of the Crooked Lake to our right hand; and
after riding some distance we came in sight of it to
our left, and saw where it empties into Mud Lake.
Rode down near that to this mill which is on the
outlet called Mud Creek; then rode down near the
same to Dolson's , where it empties into the Cohocton;
nine miles. On our way we passed several little
lakes, it being most of the way through a low piece
of land covered with lofty white pine, though not
very large, and, I think, an unhealthy place. Thirty-
two miles. 13th. I rose up out of bed about four o'clock this
morning, haing had, I think, the most unmerciful
set of bed-fellows I ever experienced; for after I found
it was in vain to stand them battle, I submitted and
surrendered to them. But let me be as passive as I
 would, they gave me no quarter, but continued to use
their offensive weapons upon me full as much as if
I had been striving to aggravate them; until I
thought best to plan a retreat, and am glad to escape
with whole bones, but am afraid some of them will
follow or keep with me all day. About six o'clock
we all set off and rode down the Cohoctontwelve
miles to the Painted Post, through a bottom of pretty
good land. Fed our horses and parted with Joseph
Jones, who hath been an agreeable company thus far.
Thence to Lindsley's , and dined; all the way up the
Tioga, twelve miles. At the Painted Post we crossed
the Cohocton; from Lindsley's to Berry's , ten miles,
where we propose to lodge. One mile from Lind-
sley's crossed the Cowanesque. Thirty-four miles. 14th. At Berry's , on the Tioga, we have had as
good a supper and night's lodging as we could have
expected at Cheltenham or Caln. Nine miles; having
ridden forty-three miles up the Tioga and crossed it
eight or nine times, through a rich flat of land.
Thence to the block-house, eleven miles, it being de-
serted and without inhabitant that we discovered, ex-
cept one cat. On examining the house, we chose to
raise our tent, kindle a fire, and lie on the ground,
where we had a much more comfortable night than
we should have had if French Anthony had still
 lived there. Thirty-two miles. 15th. A little before day-break it began to thun-
der, and by the time it was light enough to set off, it
 rained middling fast; but we could do no better than
to set off in it over the remainder of the Savage or
Allegheny Mountain, it being a very bad road, though
much better than four years ago. It rained until we
came to Trout Run, nine miles from the block-house,
which is at the foot or lowermost part of the south
 side of that great mountain, which is twenty miles
across from Peter's camp to Trout Run, and a great
part of it pretty good land, but rough and rocky in
some places. We then rode down a narrow valley,
down which the aforesaid run descends, to Reynold's
tavern, fifteen miles from the block-house. In about
four miles' riding down the valley, we crossed Trout
Run thirty times. Here we breakfasted and dined
both at once. Thence to Williamsport, fourteen miles,
it being a place we passed going out, [we] having
now performed a revolution by encircling a very large
circuitous route of settled and unsettled country.
Here fed our horses. Thos. Stewardson, , John Shoe-
maker, and George Vaux propose to stay all night;
Isaac Bonsal and myself rode three miles farther to
the widow Harris's and lodged. Thirty-two miles. 16th and first of the week. Rode nine miles to
Wm. Ellis's , and put up my mare, then walked one
mile back to meeting. There I met all my compan-
ions who with me came to Ellis's to dinner. In the
afternoon I discovered my mare to be in such a con-
dition that she could move but with great difficulty;
 we supposing her to be foundered, sent for some tar
and applied it in the usual way. Went to bed not
expecting her to be fit to travel to-morrow. 17th. My mare rather better, but not fit to ride.
We set off; I walked and drove her before me,
and walked to Milton, a beautiful town on the bank
of the west branch of the Susquehanna, sixteen
miles, and dined. Thence to Sunbury, fourteen
miles, and lodged; having walked about twenty-five
miles, my brethren spelling me some times. North-
umberland is a town about twelve miles below Mil-
ton, standing in the point between the west and the
northeast branches of the Susquehanna, which we
passed through just before we crossed the northeast
branch and about two miles above Sunbury. Had
it not been that the situation of my mare and walk-
ing on foot occasioned some unpleasant sensations, it
would have been a very pleasant day's travel down
 the river through a good deal of good land pretty
well improved. I believe each of those three towns
 contains about one hundred houses beautifully situa-
ted, but I think Milton is the most so. Crossed the
Chillisquaque about five miles above Northumber-
land. Thirty miles. 18th. Set off early on foot and left my companions
to drive my mare. Directly crossed Shamokin Creek
and walked from the town fourteen miles to Thuhns-
man's tavern, the others coming there. About three
miles from said tavern crossed the Mahanoy, and just
by the inn, the Swope Creek. Thence to Little's tav-
ern and ferry, twenty-one miles, having walked about
nineteen miles to-day. About midway of the last
stage crossed Mahontongo, and about a mile back
 from Little's crossed Wiconisco. Almost all the way
 from Sunberry here is, in my opinion, very poor land,
both mountains and valleys, notwithstanding some
of it heretofore hath been celebrated as excellent,
being much of it set with scrubby pitch pine. The
fields in general look poor and dreary and the cattle
mostly poor with their hair standing the wrong way.
 Thirty-five miles. 19th. Pursued my journey on foot, ten miles, in
which I crossed Peter's Mountain, where I mounted
my invalid mare and rode four miles to McAllister's .
 The greater part of this stage very poor and some
of it exceeding rough land. When we arrived at
 McAllister's , I discovered on the sign in large letters,
The Practical Farmer, which together with what
I had heard heretofore of the man's extent and pro-
 ficiency in agriculture, raised my expectations of see-
ing something extraordinary, but was very much dis-
appointed, the garden and barn excepted. Break-
fasted and rode six miles down the river through a
beautiful country to Harrisburg, a beautiful town on
the bank of the river, which I suppose contains 300
 houses; thence to Middletown, nine miles, land very
similar to the last mentioned. This town, I suppose,
 contains about one hundred houses; thence to Eliza-
bethtown, eight miles. One mile after leaving Mid-
dletown, crossed the beautiful Swatara. Here we
propose to lodge, and had it not been for the state
my riding dependence was in, it would have been a
very pleasant day's travel of thirty-seven miles. 20th. Walked nine miles, my company coming
up with me, got on my mare and rode to Wm.
Webb's, ten more. At Lancaster Thomas Stewardson 
took a passage in the stage and I rode his horse home,
the mare following twenty-six miles home, where I
had the satisfaction to find my family in health;
having been from home six weeks all to one night,
 and traveled 950 miles. ISAAC COATES, SR. THE ingenuity which society exerts to surround
with a glamour of romance the horrible business of
wholesale slaughter, is worthy of a better cause. It
was a lady--the Marchioness of Londonderry--who
last week presented new colors to a military company
at Dublin. If it were possible to produce a photo-
graph of the carnage of a battlefield, no lady who
saw it would ever touch any part of the trappings of
the agents in it.--The Christian. OUR minds are filled, not by what we put into
them, but by what we give out from them. 